
 





CAPSTONE PROJECT REPORT
Report 1 - Project Introduction











- Hanoi, January 2026 -
Table of Contents
I.	Record of Changes	3
II. Project Introduction	4
1. Overview	4
1.1. Project Information	4
1.2. Project Team	4
2. Product Background	4
2.1. Introduction to CTF	4
2.2. CTF Competition at FPT University	14
3. Existing Systems	16
3.1. Overview of previous FCTF versions	16
3.2. Operating procedures	17
3.3. Legacy platform and functionality in the system	19
3.4. Customization compared to the original software	20
3.5. System features	21
3.6. Security & Architecture Analysis	30
3.7. Remaining weaknesses of the FCTF system	35
3.8. Potential solutions	70
3.9. Summary of Issue-Solution Mapping	94
4. Business Opportunity	95
4.1. Market demand	95
4.2. Target customers	96
4.3. Competitive value	96
4.4. Expansion potential	97
5. Software Product Vision	97
5.1. Vision	97
5.2. Core values	97
5.3. Target audience	98
5.4. Product objectives	99
5.5. Long-term orientation	99
6. Project Scope & Limitations	99
6.1. In Scope	99
6.2. Out of Scope	100
III. References	101

I.	Record of Changes
Date	A, M, D*	In charge	Change Description
06/01	A	NhatKA	2. Product background
08/01	A	NhatKA	4. Business Opportunity
08/01	A	NhatKA	5. Software Product Vision
10/01	M	NhatKA	6. Project Scope & Limitations
31/01	M	DucDM	3.5
31/01	M	TrungTM	3.1, 3.2, 3.3, 3.4, 3.6
31/01	M	NhatKA	2, 4, 5, 6
*A - Added M - Modified D - Deleted














II. Project Introduction
1. Overview
The project “Upgrade the FPT Capture The Flag System - The annual FPTU Seckathon competition platform for cybersecurity engineers at FPT University” is the fourth development phase of the F-CTF platform, focusing on a comprehensive upgrade of the existing system to ensure stability, security, and scalability for the large-scale Secathon competition at FPT University.
The project focuses on addressing limitations in performance, security, and user experience to deliver a fair and professional playground for the cybersecurity community at FPT University. The goal is to build a stable and sustainable CTF platform that best serves the annual large-scale competition, creating a solid foundation for developing cybersecurity human resources at FPT University through high-quality and professional competitions.
1.1. Project Information
- Project name: Upgrade the FPT Capture The Flag System - The annual FPTU Seckathon competition platform for cybersecurity engineers at FPT University
- Project code: F-CTF
- Group name: SEP490-G80
- Software type: Web application
1.2. Project Team
Full Name	Role	Email	  Mobile
 Ngô Tùng Sơn	 Supervisor	sonnt69@fe.edu.vn

 Phạm Phú Mạnh	 Co-Supervisor	manhpn2@fpt.edu.vn

 Đỗ Minh Đức	 Leader	ducdmhe181735@fpt.edu.vn	0376807025
 Trần Mạnh Trung	 Member	trungtmhe182148@fpt.edu.vn	0329611845
 Nguyễn Xuân Quý	 Member	quynxhe186459@fpt.edu.vn	0862003064
 Khuất Anh Nhật	 Member	nhatkahe181763@fpt.edu.vn	0972968271
 Hoàng Tuấn Kiên	 Member	kienhthe182255@fpt.edu.vn	0359899004
Table 1: Project Team
2. Product Background
2.1. Introduction to CTF
2.1.1. About the CTF competition
Capture the Flag (CTF) is a specialized competition format in the field of information security, where participants solve security challenges to collect special character strings called “flags”. The competition organizers design systems and applications containing vulnerabilities of varying difficulty levels, requiring contestants to analyze, exploit weaknesses, and obtain the flag – a distinctive character string used as proof of successfully solving the challenge.
CTF competitions serve many purposes: creating a competitive environment for individuals and teams, building a practical learning platform to accumulate real-world experience, enhancing information security capabilities, simulating real attack scenarios in a safe environment, and developing critical thinking and problem-solving skills. Many cybersecurity experts acknowledge that the mindset and methods of CTF nurture creativity, persistence, adaptability, and a continuous learning spirit – factors that have direct value in professional work.
2.1.2. Type of CTF Competitions
2.1.2.1. Jeopardy-style CTF
This format includes various challenges divided into multiple categories such as: Web Security, Forensics, Cryptography, and Binary Exploitation. Each topic will have challenges of different difficulty levels corresponding to different point values. During the competition, scores are continuously updated, and the team with the highest score at the end of the round wins; if two teams have equal scores, the time of flag submission is compared to determine the winning team. The challenge categories in this format include the following groups:
Binary Exploitation (Pwn)
In this group, contestants exploit vulnerabilities in already-compiled programs to take control, usually gaining shell access or arbitrary code execution to obtain the flag. Success in this field requires proficiency in tools such as gdb and specialized pwn toolkits.
Common vulnerabilities include:
●	Buffer Overflow: This is an abnormal phenomenon that occurs when software writes data into a buffer area beyond the capacity allocated to that memory region, leading to overwriting adjacent memory regions. For example, a program reads the user’s input string into a fixed buffer on the stack without checking the length; the attacker provides data longer than allowed, causing the data to overflow into the return address storage area of the function. The attacker controls the overwritten value, redirecting the execution flow to code controlled by themselves or to code already present in the program.
●	Use-After-Free: This is a vulnerability related to unsafe use of dynamic memory. After a memory region has been freed, the pointer pointing to that region is still used. For example, the attacker can cause the heap to reallocate the exact same memory region for data controlled by themselves, thereby overwriting important fields such as function pointers. When the program continues to use the old pointer, the execution flow is redirected to an address controlled by the attacker.
●	Format String Vulnerabilities: These occur when a program allows user-supplied data to be used directly as a format string in functions such as printf without controlling the content. The attacker can exploit special format specifiers (such as %n) to read or write data to arbitrary memory addresses, causing information leaks or taking control of the execution flow.
Advanced exploitation techniques based on these foundations include:
●	Shellcode Injection: The technique of injecting executable code into writable memory regions, then redirecting the execution flow to this code segment to create a shell or establish a network connection. For example, the attacker writes shellcode into the stack or heap, then overwrites the function’s return address so that the program jumps to the memory region containing the shellcode. When the shellcode is executed, the attacker can open a shell or perform system control actions.
●	Return-Oriented Programming (ROP): This is a popular technique used to exploit buffer overflow vulnerabilities, allowing the attacker to control the program’s execution flow by utilizing short code segments already present in the binary or library. For example, the attacker arranges in the stack a chain of addresses pointing to short code segments already present in the program or library, each ending with a ret instruction. When the function ends, the program sequentially executes these gadgets, thereby performing unwanted actions such as calling system functions or opening a shell.
Web Security Exploitation
This is a prevalent group of challenges, focusing on detecting and exploiting vulnerabilities in web applications. Contestants need to approach the problem with an attack mindset, thoroughly understanding the HTTP protocol, web architecture, HTML, JavaScript, PHP, and specialized tools. Common vulnerabilities include:
●	SQL Injection: This is a web security vulnerability that allows an attacker to interfere with the queries that the application sends to the database. This allows the attacker to view data that they would normally not be permitted to access. This data can include information of other users or any data the application has access rights to. Even, the attacker can edit or delete this data.
Example of SQL Injection extracted from CTF Handbook5: 
<?php
    $username = $_GET['username'];
    $result = mysql_query("SELECT * FROM users WHERE username='$username'");
?>
The attacker can enter the username string:
text
' OR 1=1 --
Then the condition OR 1=1 is always true, and -- is used to comment out the rest of the query. As a result, the database returns all records, the attacker can log in illegally or obtain the flag in the CTF.
●	OS Command Injection: This is a security vulnerability that allows an attacker to execute operating system commands on the server running the application. Command injection is a prevalent privilege escalation method in web applications and applications that interact with system commands. The consequence is usually that the attacker can take complete control of the application as well as all its data.
Example of OS Command Injection extracted from CTF Handbook5:
“import os
domain = user_input()
os.system('ping ' + domain)”
The attacker can enter: “; ls”. Then the command executed by the operating system is: “ping ; ls”
As a result, the semicolon will end the ping command, and the ls command is executed next. Then the attacker can list files, read the flag, or escalate privileges.
●	Cross-Site Scripting (XSS): Cross-Site Scripting (XSS) is a vulnerability that allows a user to inject malicious JavaScript into a web application, causing this code to be executed by other users’ browsers. Because JavaScript has strong access rights to the browser (DOM, cookies, sending requests), XSS can be exploited to steal cookies, impersonate users, or trick users into providing login information. XSS is usually divided into three main types:
o	Reflected XSS: Occurs when the payload is transmitted through a URL parameter and the server responds directly in the page content. Depending on the position where the malicious code is injected, its structure may need to be different. In addition, the malicious code can be modified to suit the attacker’s purpose. Whether it is extracting cookies and sending them to an external server, or simply modifying the page to distort it.
Example: “https://ctf101.org?data=<script>alert(1)</script>” . If the application directly inserts the data value into HTML without filtering, the browser will execute: <script>alert(1)</script>. 
o	Stored XSS: Stored XSS occurs when the payload is stored on the server, for example in comments, posts, or user profiles. This type of attack is more dangerous than Reflected XSS because it does not require a special URL while the browser is very difficult to detect and prevent, and the number of victims that can be affected is very large.
Example: Attacker posts a comment containing malicious script “<script>alert('XSS');</script>”. The backend application stores the original comment content into the database. When other users access the page (for example: the post page), the server will retrieve the comment from the database and display it in HTML: “<div class="comment"> <script>...</script></div>”. The browser will execute the JavaScript in the comment, allowing the attacker to access and retrieve the victim’s cookie and login token data.
o	DOM XSS: The DOM XSS vulnerability is an XSS vulnerability caused by the browser itself injecting malicious XSS code into the DOM. Although the server can effectively prevent XSS, client-side scripts can still accidentally retrieve the malicious code and insert it into the DOM, causing the vulnerability to be triggered. The error is not on the server but on the client-side JavaScript files that cause the problem.
Example: 
Client-side code: “<script>document.write(location.search);</script>”
The attacker sends the victim a URL like this:
https://vulnerable-site.com/?<script>alert(1)</script>
Then the client-side JavaScript retrieves the data from the URL (location.search) and writes it directly into document.write without checking, allowing the attacker to execute arbitrary JavaScript code in the user’s browser.
●	Directory Traversal: Directory Traversal attack vulnerability is a vulnerability in which the application receives input data from the user and uses it in the directory path. Any type of path controlled by the user’s input data that is not handled correctly or not protected in an isolated environment (sandbox) can be easily attacked by directory traversal. This vulnerability is very often used to leak sensitive data or extract application source code to find other vulnerabilities.
Example of Directory Traversal extracted from CTF Handbook5:
<?php
$page = $_GET['page'];
include("/var/www/html/" . $page);
?>
The application expects the user to enter “?page=index.php”, then it will load “/var/www/html/index.php”. The attacker will change the page value to: “?page=../../../../etc/passwd”. PHP will not check the page value, and the string “../../../../” will cause the operating system to go up to the parent directory, resulting in the system accessing the path “/etc/passwd”. As a result, the passwd file is read, and sensitive user account information is returned directly to the browser.
●	Server-Side Request Forgery (SSRF): This is a web security vulnerability that allows an attacker to force the server-side application to send requests to unwanted addresses. The attacker can force the server to send requests to services that are only used internally within the organization’s infrastructure, such as internal services, databases, or administrative APIs that normally cannot be accessed directly from the outside. This can lead to leakage of sensitive data, such as authentication information or access tokens.
Example of Server-Side Request Forgery from Port Swigger6:
The app checks inventory, the server will send a request to the URL in stockApi and return the result to the user:
“stockApi=http://stock.weliketoshop.net:8080/product/stock/check”
The attacker will change the url to: “stockApi=http://localhost/admin”. As a result, the server will send a request to itself (localhost). And because the request comes from the internal server, authentication or access control steps will be skipped, and as a result the server will retrieve the content of the URL /admin and return it to the user and grant full access rights to the administration function.
Cryptography
Cryptography in CTF focuses on encryption and decryption problems, from classic cipher systems to modern algorithms currently used in practice. The contestant’s goal is to recover plaintext from ciphertext, find the secret key, or vice versa, based on analyzing the algorithm and errors in the way the cipher is used. Cryptography challenge types in CTF include:
●	Classical Ciphers: These are historical encryption methods such as Caesar, Vigenère, Substitution, Hill, Playfair. These cipher systems are usually based on substituting or permuting characters in the original text. Breaking classical cipher systems is usually based on frequency analysis of characters, guessing key length or trying all possible possibilities.
●	Hash Functions: Hashing functions are one-way functions used to convert any data (string, file…) into a fixed value, called hash or digest. This algorithm always produces output of fixed length, regardless of how large or small the original input is.
Example of Hash Functions:
The attacker can use a Rainbow table – a pre-computed table of original passwords → corresponding hashes. For example:
password   → 5f4dcc3b5aa765d61d8327deb882cf99
123456     → e10adc3949ba59abbe56e057f20f883e
admin      → 21232f297a57a5a743894a0e4a801fc3
qwerty     → d8578edf8458ce06fbc5bb76a58c5ca4
The attacker only needs to compare the hash in the database to reverse-engineer the password, thereby logging into the user account or obtaining the flag.
●	Stream Cipher and One-Time Pad Reuse: This is a challenge type that exploits the error of keystream reuse in Stream Ciphers. When the same keystream is used to encrypt multiple different plaintexts, the attacker can combine the ciphertexts to remove the keystream, thereby deducing the relationship or content of the plaintext.
Suppose a system uses a stream cipher and reuses the same keystream K to encrypt two different plaintexts: P1 = "HELLO123", P2 = "flag{test}". The encryption process: C1 = P1 ⊕ K, C2 = P2 ⊕ K. The attacker does not know K, but can obtain C1 and C2. Then the attacker calculates: C1 ⊕ C2 = (P1 ⊕ K) ⊕ (P2 ⊕ K) = P1 ⊕ P2. If the attacker guesses part of the plaintext, for example knowing that the flag usually starts with "flag{", then a known-plaintext attack can be performed: (P1 ⊕ P2)[0:5] ⊕ "flag{" → deduce "HELLO".
Digital Forensics
Digital Forensics in Capture The Flag (CTF) competitions focuses on collecting, analyzing, and recovering digital data to find hidden evidence or reconstruct events that occurred in the system. Challenges in this field usually simulate real investigation situations, in which contestants must analyze digital artifacts such as system files, memory, network traffic, logs or deleted data to trace user or attacker behavior.
●	File Forensics: Focuses on analyzing files to find hidden, concealed or altered data. Contestants must examine file structure, metadata, format signatures or embedded content in files such as images, audio, video, PDF or compressed files.
Example of File Forensics: When opening a file with a hex editor, the first bytes are seen: “FF D8 FF E0 00 10 4A 46 49 46 00”, in ASCII form, this string corresponds to: “ÿØÿà JFIF”. Looking up in the file signature database shows this is a JPEG/JFIF image file. The attacker can check on Linux with the command: “file file-a.jpg” and obtain the result “JPEG image data, JFIF standard 1.01, 1024x576, baseline”. Once the file format is identified, the attacker can use image processing tools to exploit metadata – which may contain hidden flag data.
●	Memory Forensics: This is a challenge type that requires analysis of a running system’s memory snapshot (memory dump). Through surveying data in RAM, contestants can find running processes, sensitive data, network connections or artifacts that do not exist on disk. Memory dumps are usually large in size but can be analyzed effectively using popular tools today: Volatility Framework.
A basic execution process will include the following steps: First, extract strings to find quick clues. Next, identify the operating system profile of the memory dump. The third step is to extract processes and search for suspicious processes (for example: powershell.exe, notepad.exe). After identifying the suspicious process, extract data from those processes and open it with the appropriate tool such as Word for .docx files or Notepad for .txt files. For example, notepad.exe dump: “python vol.py -f image.raw --profile=Win7SP0x64 memdump -p 2019 -D dump/”, the result is a .dmp file containing the entire RAM data of the process which may include: unsaved data, plaintext flag.
●	Network Forensics: Network Forensics is the process of analyzing network traffic to collect, investigate and reconstruct activities that have taken place on the system. Network forensics usually focuses on analyzing PCAP (Packet Capture) files, which are recordings of all packets transmitted over the network at a certain time. PCAP files allow analysts to observe each packet in detail, including protocol information, source/destination IP addresses, network ports and especially payload data – where sensitive information or flags are often contained in plaintext.
Example of exploiting Packet Capture in Network Forensics: Suppose an attacker has gained access to a machine in the internal network (for example via SSH). The attacker uses tcpdump to collect network traffic on the eth0 interface – a network interface on the Linux/Unix operating system, to monitor data transmitted over the network: “sudo tcpdump -i eth0 -w traffic.pcap”. During this process, the attacker detects unencrypted HTTP packets. Then, the traffic.pcap file is opened with Wireshark to analyze the payload of HTTP request/response packets in detail. Here, the attacker can obtain login information, session cookies or flags transmitted in plaintext.
●	Steganography: The technique of hiding information is a method of hiding information in various media, such as images, audio, text, or video. Hiding information is usually achieved by embedding secret data into existing data in a way that is difficult to detect. Steganography topics include:
○	Text steganography: Messages can be hidden by changing the size of spaces, or in text without diacritics.
○	Audio steganography: In audio files, information can be hidden by modifying inaudible frequency bands or adding to any area in the audio without affecting quality.
○	Video steganography: Information can be hidden in unimportant frames in the video.
○	Image steganography: Information can be hidden in the least significant bits of pixels. For example, changing the smallest RGB value of each pixel does not significantly change the image but still contains secret information.
Reverse Engineering
Reverse Engineering in CTF is a group of challenges that requires analyzing already-compiled programs (such as ELF, EXE, Java/.NET bytecode, APK) to understand the internal logic and thereby find the flag. The main goal of Reverse Engineering is not to exploit vulnerabilities, but to recover the algorithm, check conditions or hidden data in the program. Reverse Engineering challenges usually include analyzing native programs, analyzing bytecode or obfuscated/packed code. Players approach the problem through static analysis using disassembler/decompiler tools to read machine code and program structure, combined with dynamic analysis using debuggers to track execution flow and variable values when the program runs.
Decompiler is a tool used to convert an already-compiled program (binary) back into pseudocode, helping to analyze program logic when there is no source code. Some popular decompilers include IDA, Ghidra, Binary Ninja.
Open Source Intelligence (OSINT)
OSINT in CTF is a group of challenges focusing on collecting and analyzing information from publicly available sources on the Internet to find the flag. Unlike purely technical fields, OSINT does not require exploiting software vulnerabilities but relies on the ability to search, synthesize and infer information.
OSINT challenges usually provide a very limited amount of initial data, such as username, image, email address or website. From there, contestants must trace digital footprints through search engines, social networks, open databases, metadata, web archive history or other publicly available information sources to piece together data and determine the target information.
Example OSINT in CTF:
A typical OSINT challenge (shared in write-up) requires contestants to determine the geographic location of a provided photo and submit the flag as GPS coordinates or Google Maps link. The solving process includes the following steps:
1.	Contestants observe the provided image - for example, seeing a building with distinctive colours (orange, blue, white).
2.	The solver pastes the photo into Google/Yandex to find a website or similar image to find an article with a similar building image.
3.	Find detailed address from reference source: The page found describes the building and its location - belonging to this area and being one of Google’s offices.
4.	Search in Google Maps: With the area name and building, the contestant switches to Google Maps, searches for “Tottenham Court Road” → opens satellite map → guesses the photo location.
⇒ GPS coordinates identified: 51.51730173654459, -0.12462196379354945
Miscellaneous
Miscellaneous (Misc) in CTF is a combined category that includes challenges that do not belong to any single technical field such as Web, Pwn or Reverse. Misc challenges are usually related to OSINT, Encoding, Steganography, basic Forensics and logic puzzle challenges. This is a category suitable for beginners, helping to get familiar with analytical thinking, information search skills and creativity in information security.
2.1.2.2. Attack-Defense Format
This competition format follows the original classic CTF rules and is more difficult than other formats due to higher requirements. In addition to skills in finding security vulnerabilities and exploiting those vulnerabilities, players also need the ability to fix weaknesses, vulnerabilities, and protect their own systems against attacks from other teams. Another difference is the way points are calculated for competing teams. Points in this format are calculated based on different criteria such as: Attack points, defense points, bonus points, …
After the competition ends, the team with the highest score wins. This is the competition format closest to the real network security situation. Attackers perform attacks on the system while network administrators and security specialists have the task of resisting attacks from outside, while still ensuring the system’s operation…. The most famous competition about this format is DEF CON CTF.
This format can be hosted either online or locally on a shared LAN. As the name 'Attack & Defense' suggests, each participating team is assigned a server (known as a Team Box) that runs various services. All Team Boxes contain the same undisclosed security vulnerabilities. The goal of each team is to maintain the existing Services throughout the competition. Each team’s task is to find and patch the server’s vulnerabilities, while utilizing their knowledge of the vulnerabilities they have found to attack and affect other teams’ Services, bypassing the Services’ security mechanisms to capture the flag of each Service.
2.1.2.3. Hybrid Format
This is a combination of the two formats above, for example combining the attack-only format with different types of challenges. In this format, teams do not have their own servers, but instead teams will attack existing servers in the system; these servers also have vulnerabilities, and teams use their skills to find those vulnerabilities and use them to complete the tasks and challenges set by the organizers. Hybrid Format allows comprehensive assessment of participants’ capabilities, from analytical thinking, skill in solving challenges in each field, to the ability to operate, secure and respond to real attacks.
2.2. CTF Competition at FPT University
Over the years, CTF competitions have been regularly organized at FPT University on various scales and formats, from internal club competitions to school-level and nationwide competitions. The types of challenges used are not limited to the traditional Jeopardy model but also include the Attack-Defense format, depending on the training objectives and organization scale of each competition.
At the internal club level, CTF competitions are mainly organized with the goal of training skills for members. The scale of each competition usually ranges from about 10 to 15 teams, each team consisting of about 5 members. With this scale, CTF is used as a practical training tool, helping members practice technical skills, team coordination and get familiar with competition pressure in a real information security environment.
At a larger level, FPTU SecAthon is a specialized information security competition organized by FPT University, aimed at students from universities, academies and colleges nationwide. The competition is built according to the CTF Jeopardy model (Capture The Flag), a popular competition format in the international security community. In this model, teams must solve independent challenges in many different areas of information security knowledge, including cryptography, reverse engineering, web application vulnerability exploitation, digital investigation, binary exploitation and miscellaneous problems. Through directly analyzing systems, exploiting vulnerabilities and collecting “flags”, contestants are trained in attack-defense thinking as well as the ability to apply theoretical knowledge to real situations.
The motivation for contestants to participate in SecAthon lies not only in the prize factor but also in reputation, professional level and competition among schools. The target audience of the competition is students passionate about the field of information security, regardless of training school or year of study. FPT University maintains organizing school-level CTF competitions with an average frequency of once per year, while the EHC club organizes internal competitions about twice a year. This high organization frequency shows that the demand for using the CTF platform in training and competition at the school is very large and continuous.
The competition time for CTF competitions at the school usually lasts about 5 hours for focused competitions. In recent years, especially in 2025, the scale and scope of organization of SecAthon has been expanded from internal competitions at FPT University campuses to a format allowing students from universities, academies and colleges nationwide to participate. This expansion has significantly increased the number of competing teams, system access traffic and the complexity of competition infrastructure operation.
Along with competition activities, the organizers and club also set the desire to build a dedicated CTF system for the school. This system not only serves competitions but also acts as a repository of exam questions over the years, and can be integrated into specialized subjects to build practical lab exercises for students. In reality, current CTF platforms mainly serve short-term competition purposes and have not been effectively exploited in the role of supporting long-term teaching and training.
From the actual competition organization needs, an important requirement for the CTF system is the ability to open multiple challenge instances simultaneously for competing teams. Each team needs the ability to open multiple challenges at the same time, allowing team members to solve different challenges in parallel, thereby ensuring progress and competition experience. This is especially important for competitions with long duration and large numbers of challenges.
The long-term goal of CTF competitions at FPT University is not only to organize competitions but also to detect and train talents in the cybersecurity field. Through CTF, the school and club can select outstanding students for in-depth training, participate in future research and development projects, as well as build teams to participate in domestic and international cybersecurity competitions. These activities contribute to enhancing the reputation of FPT University in information security training and open up many career opportunities for contestants at large corporations and cybersecurity companies.
Currently, CTF competitions in the EHC club mainly use popular platforms such as CTFd, GZCTF or some commercial products originating from China. These platforms generally meet well in terms of user experience and basic functions; however, they often require relatively large copyright fees and are limited in the number of instances that can be deployed simultaneously. Previously, the club used a customized CTFd version, but to meet specific needs, members still had to self-develop many supporting plugins, increasing maintenance costs and system complexity.
From a technical perspective, the most important requirement for the CTF competition system is stability throughout the competition process, especially for competitions that run continuously, possibly up to two days. The organizers desire the system to achieve zero downtime even when source code updates are needed; in case of force majeure, the maximum allowable downtime is only 1-2 minutes to ensure contestant experience and the school’s reputation. In addition, the issue of exam question security is placed first, including ensuring the integrity of challenges when deployed, preventing the risk of answer leakage and avoiding forms of cheating during the competition.
Besides core technical and security requirements, the future CTF system also needs to be improved in terms of interface and brand identity. The competition platform is expected to carry the distinctive identity of FPT University, thereby contributing to building the image and reputation in the information security community.
3. Existing Systems
3.1. Overview of previous FCTF versions
The F-CTF system has been built and developed through many stages to meet the needs of organizing information security competitions in the university environment, especially serving training and competition activities at FPT University. Through each version, the system has been continuously improved in terms of architecture, performance, scalability and stability.
In the initial stage (version 1), the system was developed with the goal of overcoming the limitations of traditional CTF platforms. F-CTF was designed according to a model of 4 subsystems including: Challenge Hosting Platform, Contestant Platform, Management Platform and Control Center Platform. This architecture helps clearly separate functions and permissions between user groups, including Administrators (Admin), Contestants (Contestant), Challenge Writers and Jury. The highlight of version 1 is the automation of the challenge deployment process through Kubernetes/kCTF, providing a separate competition environment for each team, while replacing the manual storage method with a centralized system. As a result, the system initially ensured security, fairness and stable operation. However, version 1 still had many limitations, especially in resource management and system monitoring. Specifically, the system did not have a mechanism to limit the number of environments each team could create, did not set CPU and RAM limits for pods, did not have a mechanism to reclaim unused resources, and the monitoring tool was still simple, mainly based on Metrics Server.
Based on the foundation of version 1, version 2 focused on improving performance, optimizing resources and enhancing monitoring capabilities. The development team performed maintenance and re-testing of the entire system, fixing Kubernetes API integration errors, improving the interface and adding clearer error handling mechanisms. Key improvements in version 2 included integrating Redis to store and cache challenge environment information, implementing a Semaphore mechanism to limit the number of environments created simultaneously, checking the existence of the environment before creating a new one to avoid wasting resources, and automatically deleting the environment at the end of the competition. In addition, the monitoring system was comprehensively upgraded through integration of Prometheus and Grafana, helping to monitor resources, logs and system status in real time. The system also added visualization functions for competition progress and improved emergency notification mechanisms for contestants, contributing to enhancing user experience.
Version 3 of F-CTF continued to be developed to overcome the remaining issues of versions 1 and 2 after being run at Secathon2025. The operation process revealed many limitations in load capacity, resource allocation and stability when many users accessed simultaneously. On that basis, version 3 was developed and the system was restructured. One of the most important improvements was standardizing the infrastructure on the Kubernetes platform, unifying all services on a single container orchestration layer. The system moved from a monolithic architecture to a Microservices model, clearly separating the contestant system and the administration system, thereby minimizing bottlenecks and enhancing scalability. In terms of operation, the system applied an automated CI/CD process through Argo Workflows, helping to fully automate the challenge lifecycle from image building, deployment to resource recovery. At the same time, the system implemented atomic concurrent control using Redis Lua Script, aiming to eliminate Race Condition errors in the process of creating environments and submitting flags. In addition, user experience continued to be improved with features such as PDF challenge description support, visual deployment status display and real-time feedback. The system also built a two-way data synchronization mechanism with the original CTFd platform, ensuring continuity in case of infrastructure incidents.
Through three development stages, the F-CTF system has been continuously improved in terms of architecture, performance and operation. Version 1 laid the initial foundation with a four-subsystem model, automated challenge deployment and clear separation of user permissions; however, it still had limitations in resource management and monitoring. Version 2 focused on performance optimization, added resource control mechanisms through Redis and Semaphore, and upgraded the monitoring system with Prometheus and Grafana. By version 3, after the actual deployment of version 2 at SecAthon 2025, the system was comprehensively restructured towards Microservices, standardized on the Kubernetes platform and automated operation processes with CI/CD. Concurrent control mechanisms, user experience improvements and data synchronization were also enhanced.
3.2. Operating procedures
The operation process of the F-CTF system in version 3 is designed in a standardized and automated direction, including three main stages: pre-competition preparation, operation during the competition and post-competition processing. Compared to previous versions, which still depended heavily on manual intervention by the intermediate operation team (MrX), version 3 no longer has this role through completing the coordination mechanism and automating the deployment of competition environments.
In the preparation stage, the organizers develop an organization plan, assign personnel and establish official communication channels to support contestants throughout the competition time. The system is fully configured with operation parameters such as start time, end time and scoreboard freeze time. Challenges are compiled, tested and updated to the system with full information about content, scores, attached files, hints and related conditions.
In version 3, each challenge is standardized in the form of a directory containing Dockerfile and necessary configuration files. After completing the content, the challenge writer uploads the previously prepared challenge file. During the competition, when contestants initialize the practice environment, the system will automatically load the corresponding image and deploy it on the Kubernetes platform. Before the official competition day, the organizers conduct a comprehensive test of the entire operation process, including environment initialization, challenge access, flag submission and scoreboard update, to evaluate the system’s readiness in all cases.
During the competition, contestants access the Contestant Portal to select challenges, track progress and submit answers. For challenges that require a separate environment to be deployed, the system in version 3 automatically initializes through the coordination mechanism on Kubernetes, no longer depending on manual support from the intermediate operation team as in previous versions. Each challenge environment is independent containers allocated separately for each team, and is controlled in terms of resources, existence time and operating status to limit waste and resource conflicts. Teams can choose to participate in challenges randomly, however there are challenges that require solving certain challenges before access is possible, and there are challenges whose points will be reduced when teams sequentially solve them (dynamic challenges). Starting or ending a challenge can be performed automatically by team members. Note there is a time limit for challenges; when the time expires, the competition environment (challenge containers) will be automatically reclaimed and cannot be accessed.
Before the competition ends, the system activates the scoreboard freeze mechanism to ensure competitiveness and fairness among teams. During this period, submissions are still recorded and processed, however rankings are not publicly updated until the competition ends. When incidents occur, contestants can send support requests through the ticket system or official communication channels.
After the competition ends, the system automatically reclaims competition environments, releases resources and aggregates results. The official scoreboard is announced after the freeze period ends. All data related to users, submissions, system logs and resource status is stored for summarization, evaluation and reconciliation.
Based on the collected data, the organizers can analyze system performance, resource consumption, incidents and contestant feedback to propose improvements for subsequent competitions. This process contributes to maintaining continuity in improving the quality of platform operation.
In general, the operation process of F-CTF in version 3 has been redesigned towards automation and centralization. Standardizing challenges in container form, combined with the coordination mechanism on Kubernetes, helps the system strongly reduce dependence on the intermediate operation team, enhance load capacity, optimize resource management and ensure stability in large-scale competitions.
3.3. Legacy platform and functionality in the system
The F-CTF system started by being built based on inheriting and integrating two open-source platforms that have been proven in the Capture The Flag (CTF) community: CTFd and kCTF. CTFd is an open-source CTF framework developed in Python with Flask, aimed at providing a comprehensive solution for organizing, managing and operating CTF competitions. According to official documentation, CTFd is a platform that provides everything needed to operate a CTF, with high customizability through plugins and themes and focusing on ease of use as well as expansion.
In terms of functionality, CTFd supports organizers in creating and managing challenges, challenge categories, flags, and hints through an intuitive administration interface. The system allows defining flags in many different types, including static flags and regular expression (regex) flags, helping to meet many challenge types and different scoring requirements. CTFd also provides an automatically updated real-time scoreboard, supports hiding scores until the freeze time to prevent early result disclosure, and competition progress charts to help organizers and players track the match situation. The system also integrates mechanisms to prevent flag brute-force attempts and limits the number of attempts to ensure fairness and prevent abuse during flag submission. In addition, CTFd supports features such as SMTP/email management for user confirmation, password reset, along with the ability to import/export CTF data for storage and reuse for later events.
Meanwhile, kCTF is an open-source infrastructure platform developed by the Google Security team, designed to support the deployment, management and isolation of CTF challenges on the Kubernetes platform. According to kCTF’s official documentation, this is a Kubernetes-based infrastructure system for CTF competitions, helping organizers and challenge authors build, test and deploy challenges without requiring deep Kubernetes knowledge. Each challenge in kCTF is described by configuration files (YAML) specifying container image, resources, services, and network rules, from which Kubernetes automatically creates objects such as Deployment, Service and Ingress to create the competition environment.
A key point of kCTF is the use of sandboxing to isolate the competition environment. Specifically, kCTF uses nsjail, a mechanism to run challenges in a closed environment for each TCP connection, ensuring that contestant processes are isolated and do not affect each other, thereby enhancing safety and fairness in competition. In addition, kCTF provides quick and compact deployment documentation, in which challenges can be run in a few minutes with simple configuration or expanded thanks to the full features of Kubernetes such as autoscaling, health checks and integrated network services.
In general, CTFd and kCTF play the role of reference platforms and starting foundations in the process of forming the F-CTF system. Through successive development versions, especially in version 3, the system has been comprehensively redesigned in terms of architecture, functionality and operation process, thereby forming an independent platform with its own characteristics suitable for the academic environment and large-scale competitions. Selective inheritance of design principles from the two original platforms, combined with internal improvements, has created a solid technical foundation for the long-term development of F-CTF.
3.4. Customization compared to the original software
Although CTFd and kCTF provide important foundational functions for organizing and deploying Capture The Flag competitions, when applied in real-world environments with large scale, large numbers of users and complex operation requirements, these two systems still reveal certain limitations. On that basis, during the process of building F-CTF through the previous 3 versions, the development team has gradually performed customizations and expansions to more closely connect the competition management system and the container deployment platform. From the early versions, F-CTF added intermediate mechanisms to synchronize user data, challenge status and competition environment information, helping to reduce dependence on the original independent tools.
Through each version, the system was gradually adjusted to better suit real operation needs. In versions 1 and 2, improvements mainly focused on perfecting basic functions, optimizing performance and adding initial resource control mechanisms. These changes helped the system operate more stably, however they still did not fully meet requirements when the number of users increased.
By version 3, F-CTF had a clear improvement in architecture to enhance load capacity, increase stability and optimize resource usage. The system was standardized on the Kubernetes platform, gradually moving to a service separation model, while adding automation mechanisms in challenge environment deployment and recovery. Concurrent control, resource management and data synchronization were also perfected more, contributing to limiting incidents during the competition. Along with infrastructure changes, contestant interfaces and operation support tools were also adjusted and expanded through each version. In version 3, the system formed a separated frontend-backend model, making function expansion and maintenance more flexible. In addition, monitoring and system status tracking mechanisms were also tightly integrated, supporting the organizers in timely detection and handling of incidents.
In general, the improvements of F-CTF through the versions not only aimed to overcome the limitations of the original CTFd and kCTF but also changed to suit practical requirements in the training and information security competition organization environment. Especially, version 3 had major changes in architecture and operation, helping the system significantly enhance load capacity, resource management and stability, while creating a foundation for continued development in subsequent stages.
3.5. System features
3.5.1. Use case
The F-CTF system is designed to target four main user groups: Admin, Contestant, Jury, Challenge Writer. Each group has a clear role in the F-CTF system.
    
  Figure 2: Use case Diagram for Admin
Admin (Figure 2) is the user group with the highest privilege level, responsible for administering and operating the entire F-CTF system. This group performs user and team management through functions to create, update, delete, authenticate and lock/unlock accounts, further including features such as assigning captain rights to users in Team mode, creating rewards, viewing analysis information, IP addresses. Admins have the ability to send notifications to contestants, receive and handle technical support requests, and perform import/export of user data in CSV files as well as distribute login information via email. Admins have the right to delete invalid or rule-violating submissions or export data to files for storage or analysis.
In addition, Admins are responsible for configuring competition parameters such as start time, end time and scoreboard freeze period, and can adjust system settings when necessary. This group has full rights over all challenges, including creating, editing, deleting and deploying competition environments. In addition, Admins also monitor system status and operation logs to serve monitoring and incident handling. When needing to organize a new competition, Admins can delete all old competition data to prepare for the new competition.
Admins can also transfer and synchronize data between F-CTF and the original CTFd system to ensure backup, recovery and continuity in operation.
 
Figure 3: Use case Diagram for Contestant
Contestant (Figure 3) is the central user group, directly participating in solving challenges in the competition. Contestants can log into the system, access the challenge list and view detailed content of each challenge, including description documents in PDF format and related attached files and other parameters about points or time.
For challenges that require a separate deployed environment, contestants can initialize and stop isolated competition environments of challenges for their team through the system. During the competition, contestants perform flag submission to record scores, can unlock hints at the cost of corresponding points, track the scoreboard and receive notifications from the organizers.
When encountering technical incidents or difficulties in solving, contestants can send support requests through the ticket system and track processing history. In addition, users in this group can also manage personal information, view their own or team action logs, update profiles and change passwords to ensure account safety.
 
Figure 4: Use case Diagram for Jury
Jury (Figure 4) is the user group responsible for supervising and ensuring fairness and transparency throughout the competition process. This group monitors contestants’ progress through submitted flags, scoreboard information, thereby promptly detecting abnormal signs.
Jury has access to monitoring accounts, tracks progress and competition results of contestants to serve checking, reconciliation and detection of rule violations. In addition, Jury supports receiving, verifying and resolving complaints related to competition rules and fairness. This group also directly handles tickets reflecting on rules, results and competition behaviors that may be sent from Contestants.
 
Figure 5: Use case Diagram for Challenge Writer
Challenge Writer (Figure 5) is the user group responsible for designing, building and ensuring the quality of challenge content in the F-CTF system. This group has the right to create, edit and manage all information related to the challenges they are responsible for, including challenge name, description, score, challenge type, attached files, classification tags, hints, flags, challenge opening time, as well as prerequisite conditions for completing other challenges before access is possible.
During operation, Challenge Writers can flexibly update challenge attributes to suit the actual situation of the competition, while tracking the operating status and edit history of each challenge.
Challenge Writers are mainly responsible for creating challenges, needing to prepare full source code and Dockerfile according to standards for the challenge, upload the challenge zip file, the system will automatically build the image, store it on Docker Hub and be ready for environment initialization when contestants request. Challenges can be previewed and tested by Challenge Writers in an independent environment before official announcement, thereby limiting technical errors and issues arising during the competition.
3.5.2. Non-functional requirement
●	NFR-1 System Observability & Traceability
●	NFR-2 Usability & Interaction Experience Optimization
●	NFR-3 System recovery capability
●	NFR-4 Multiple teams deploy challenges concurrently
●	NFR-5 Limit resources for each service
●	NFR-6 Concurrent Handling Capability
●	NFR-7 Resource release mechanism
●	NFR-8 Resolve race condition issues
●	NFR-9 Per-Team Instance Isolation
●	NFR-10 Anti-DDoS mechanism and abnormal traffic control
3.5.3. Architecture
3.5.3.1. Component Diagram Overview
3.5.3.1.1. FCTF System
 Figure 6: Overall Component Diagram
The architecture of the F-CTF system (Figure 6) is designed based on the core business chain of a CTF competition platform. This architecture is organized according to a distributed (Microservice) model, in which each service performs an independent functional role and communicates with each other through standardized interfaces using JSON data format.
The architecture of the current system includes the following components:
●	Contestant Portal is the user interface component, responsible for displaying data and receiving operations from contestants, acting as an intermediary between users and server-side services.
●	Contestant Service is the central service that processes contestant business. This service is responsible for user authentication, input data validation, processing environment initialization requests, flag submission, scoreboard queries and session management. Contestant Service interacts directly with the database and Redis through ORM layers and specialized clients.
●	Admin Service is built according to the MVC model combined with API. This service supports the organizers in user management, competition configuration, challenge building and deployment, and system status monitoring.
●	Deployment Center is the intermediary component connecting the business layer and the infrastructure layer. This component is responsible for receiving deployment requests, coordinating the container image build process, initializing and reclaiming competition environments. Deployment Center closely coordinates with Argo Workflow, Kubernetes and Deployment Listener to perform asynchronous deployment tasks.
●	Argo Workflow and Kubernetes form the orchestration and infrastructure execution layer. Argo Workflow is responsible for managing automated processes in workflow form, while Kubernetes is responsible for managing the lifecycle of Pods, containers and system resources. Container runtimes execute challenge environments based on container images stored on Docker Hub.
●	Redis plays the role of a high-speed temporary storage and cache system, serving functions such as environment status management and cooldown control.
●	MariaDB is a relational database used to store persistent data, including user information, challenges, submissions and system configuration.
●	NFS Server is used as a centralized storage system for description files, initialization data and accompanying resources of challenges, ensuring sharing capability between services in a distributed environment.
●	Deployment Listener is the component that receives and processes events from Kubernetes, tasked with synchronizing deployment status to Redis and the database, thereby providing real-time data for business services.
3.5.3.1.2. Migration System
 
Figure 7: Migration Component Diagram
The Migration system was built to serve data conversion and backup between the F-CTF platform and the original CTFd system. Through this intermediate module, F-CTF data can be extracted, processed and synchronized to the CTFd database in a controlled manner.
Specifically, data from F-CTF is retrieved through interfaces RI1, PI1 and put into the Migration system to perform mapping and structure conversion. Then, the processed data will be transferred to the CTFd database through interfaces RI2, PI2. This mechanism helps ensure that competition data can be restored or transferred back to the CTFd system when necessary.
Thanks to the Migration system, F-CTF maintains compatibility with the original platform, while supporting data backup and recovery, contributing to ensuring continuity and safety for the competition organization process.
3.5.3.2. Deployment Diagram Overview
 
Figure 8: FCTF Deployment Diagram
Figure 8 illustrates the deployment diagram of the F-CTF system deployed on Kubernetes infrastructure with components clearly partitioned to meet the different non-functional requirements (NFR) of the system.
Orange area - NFR-4 and FR-6: Parallel deployment and isolation by team. This area shows how the system supports multiple competing teams deploying Challenges simultaneously while still ensuring isolation. Each Challenge is deployed in a separate pod, attached to an independent execution space. This organization allows multiple teams to initialize Challenges simultaneously without affecting each other. At the same time, isolation by Pod and Namespace helps ensure resources, data and status of each team are completely separated.
Red area - NFR-10: Anti-DDoS mechanism and abnormal traffic control. This is the outer protection layer of the system. All requests from users’ browsers must go through the Cloudflare service acting as the first line of defense, helping to detect and prevent DDoS attacks as well as abnormal accesses.
Blue area - NFR-6: Concurrent processing capability, representing core services operating inside the Kubernetes Cluster, including portals, services and workflow engine. These components are deployed in Pod form and can be replicated into multiple Replicas. Thanks to Kubernetes’ orchestration mechanism, the system has the ability to process a large number of requests from many competing teams simultaneously. When load increases, Pods can be scaled horizontally to share the workload, helping to maintain stable performance during peak times of the competition.
Green area - NFR-7: Resource recovery and release mechanism. This area illustrates the components responsible for managing the resource lifecycle, including CronJobs and cleanup processes. These tasks are triggered according to a preset schedule to check Challenges that have expired or unused resources. When unnecessary resources are detected, the system will automatically reclaim and release them, helping to avoid resource waste.
3.6. Security & Architecture Analysis
3.6.1. NetworkPolicy và nguyên tắc phân quyền tối thiểu (Least Privilege) (IS-1)
Trong trạng thái trước khi được hardening, hệ thống tồn tại một vấn đề mang tính nền tảng liên quan đến việc thiếu cơ chế kiểm soát truy cập ở cả tầng mạng và tầng dịch vụ. Cụ thể, namespace chứa các workload ứng dụng không được áp dụng NetworkPolicy mặc định, dẫn đến việc toàn bộ cluster vận hành theo mô hình mạng mở. Trong mô hình này, mọi pod có thể giao tiếp với nhau một cách tự do trên mọi port mà không bị ràng buộc bởi bất kỳ chính sách kiểm soát nào. Việc không có cơ chế default-deny khiến tất cả traffic ingress và egress đều được cho phép theo mặc định, vi phạm nguyên tắc zero-trust trong thiết kế hệ thống phân tán.
Từ góc độ kiến trúc, việc thiếu kiểm soát ở tầng mạng kéo theo hệ quả là nguyên tắc phân quyền tối thiểu không được áp dụng một cách nhất quán ở các thành phần phía trên. Các pod ứng dụng có thể truy cập trực tiếp đến các dịch vụ nhạy cảm như database và Redis mà không bị giới hạn theo phạm vi chức năng. Khi một pod bị xâm nhập, kẻ tấn công có thể lợi dụng quyền truy cập mạng để kết nối đến các service khác trong cluster, từ đó thực hiện lateral movement và mở rộng phạm vi tấn công. Đồng thời, việc không kiểm soát egress cho phép các workload thiết lập kết nối ra Internet, tạo điều kiện cho việc exfiltrate dữ liệu hoặc tải mã độc mà không bị phát hiện.
Vấn đề này càng trở nên nghiêm trọng hơn khi kết hợp với các cấu hình phân quyền chưa chặt chẽ ở tầng dịch vụ. Trong database, việc sử dụng chung credential cho nhiều service khiến mọi service đều có mức quyền tương đương, làm mất khả năng cô lập khi xảy ra sự cố. Nếu một service bị compromise, toàn bộ dữ liệu trong database có thể bị truy cập hoặc thao túng mà không có rào cản nào. Ngoài ra, việc user root vẫn có thể truy cập từ xa càng làm gia tăng nguy cơ privilege escalation. Hệ thống cũng không có audit logging và chưa áp dụng mã hóa kết nối, khiến việc truy vết và bảo vệ dữ liệu trong quá trình truyền tải trở nên khó khăn.
Tương tự, Redis trong trạng thái ban đầu không sử dụng cơ chế ACL và cho phép tất cả service truy cập bằng cùng một credential. Toàn bộ keyspace và command set đều được mở, không có sự phân tách theo vai trò hoặc chức năng. Điều này khiến Redis trở thành một điểm yếu nghiêm trọng trong hệ thống, đặc biệt trong bối cảnh CTF nơi dữ liệu như điểm số, trạng thái challenge và session có ý nghĩa quan trọng đối với tính công bằng. Khi một service bị xâm nhập, kẻ tấn công có thể thao túng toàn bộ trạng thái hệ thống thông qua Redis, bao gồm việc thay đổi điểm số, xóa dữ liệu hoặc theo dõi hoạt động của các service khác thông qua các command nguy hiểm.
Ở tầng lưu trữ, cấu hình NFS cũng phản ánh cùng một vấn đề về thiếu kiểm soát truy cập. Các PersistentVolume không được cấu hình mount option an toàn như noexec, cho phép thực thi binary trực tiếp từ shared storage. Đồng thời, việc không có cơ chế ACL theo service khiến các service có thể truy cập chéo dữ liệu của nhau, làm mất tính cô lập giữa các thành phần. Trong môi trường có workflow xử lý file, điều này tạo ra nguy cơ cao bị khai thác, khi kẻ tấn công có thể chèn mã độc vào storage và thực thi trực tiếp trong hệ thống.
Ngoài ra, hạ tầng orchestration và giám sát cũng chịu ảnh hưởng từ việc thiếu áp dụng nguyên tắc least privilege. Argo Workflows sử dụng giao thức HTTP cho giao tiếp nội bộ, khiến dữ liệu và token xác thực được truyền dưới dạng plaintext. Việc không giới hạn loại workflow được phép thực thi cho phép kẻ tấn công lạm dụng hệ thống orchestration để chạy các workflow độc hại. Trong khi đó, Grafana cho phép chỉnh sửa dashboard mặc định, tạo nguy cơ bị thay đổi hoặc che giấu thông tin giám sát. Đặc biệt, việc thiếu mã hóa cho traffic nội bộ giữa các pod khiến dữ liệu có thể bị đọc lén nếu kẻ tấn công có khả năng truy cập vào tầng mạng.
Tổng thể, các điểm yếu này cho thấy hệ thống trước đây chưa áp dụng nguyên tắc least privilege một cách nhất quán, không chỉ ở tầng truy cập tài nguyên mà còn ở tầng mạng và giao tiếp giữa các service. Sự thiếu đồng bộ này làm gia tăng đáng kể blast radius khi xảy ra sự cố, đồng thời làm suy yếu khả năng phòng thủ nhiều lớp của hệ thống.
3.6.2. Interface & Permission Audit
Phần này cụ thể hóa các điểm yếu đã trình bày ở 3.6.1 bằng cách phân tích từng interface tài khoản - tức là mỗi kết nối giữa một service với một thành phần hạ tầng (MariaDB hoặc Redis) - xem xét tài khoản đang được sử dụng, tập quyền thực tế, phần quyền dư thừa vượt quá nhu cầu nghiệp vụ, và đánh giá mức độ rủi ro tương ứng.
a. Đánh giá Phân quyền Database (MariaDB)
Hiện tại, tài khoản ctfd-username đang được dùng chung cho tất cả các service với quyền ALL PRIVILEGES trên toàn bộ cơ sở dữ liệu ctfd. Điều này vi phạm nguyên tắc cách ly nghiệp vụ. Bên cạnh đó, tài khoản root@% được cấp quyền GRANT ALL PRIVILEGES WITH GRANT OPTION, tạo rủi ro leo thang đặc quyền từ xa vô cùng nguy hiểm.
Bảng phân tích quyền dư thừa theo Service (MariaDB):
Giao diện (Service → DB)
Quyền tối thiểu theo nghiệp vụ	Quyền dư thừa hiện tại & Rủi ro
contestant-be	SELECT/UPDATE trên bảng users; SELECT trên challenges, hints, flags, files; SELECT/INSERT trên submissions, solves, awards, unlocks, action_logs, tokens, tracking.	Có quyền DROP, ALTER, CREATE, toàn quyền INSERT/DELETE trên bảng admin (config, tokens của service khác). Vi phạm ranh giới dữ liệu.
deployment-center	SELECT trên users, challenges; INSERT trên deploy_histories, challenge_start_tracking; UPDATE trên challenges.	Có toàn quyền trên submissions, solves, hints, flags, tokens. Nguy cơ giả mạo dữ liệu thi đấu (data tampering).
deployment-listener	SELECT/INSERT/UPDATE trên challenge_start_tracking; SELECT trên challenges.	Có toàn quyền trên mọi bảng trong database. Mức độ ảnh hưởng cực lớn nếu bị xâm nhập.
deployment-consumer	SELECT trên challenges (Chỉ cần 1 quyền duy nhất).	Nghiêm trọng nhất: Service có scope nhỏ nhất nhưng đang sở hữu ALL PRIVILEGES. Tỷ lệ dư thừa quyền cao nhất hệ thống.

b, Đánh giá Phân quyền Cache & State (Redis)
Hệ thống đang sử dụng tài khoản default (Cấu hình: auth.acl.enabled = false, mật khẩu dùng chung) với quyền truy cập không giới hạn (~*) trên mọi keyspace và toàn bộ tập lệnh (bao gồm các lệnh nguy hiểm như CONFIG, FLUSHALL, SHUTDOWN).
Bảng phân tích quyền dư thừa theo Service (Redis):
Giao diện (Service → Redis)
Keyspace/Command tối thiểu theo nghiệp vụ	Quyền dư thừa hiện tại & Rủi ro
admin-mvc	Key liên quan session admin, cache cấu hình; Các lệnh cơ bản: get/set/del/expire/scan.	Đọc/ghi toàn bộ ~* (điểm số, challenge state, deploy state). Có thể lộ dữ liệu nhạy cảm của service khác.
contestant-be	~deploy_challenge_*, ~active_deploys_team_*, ~auth:user:*, ~challenge:*, ~hint:*, v.v. Cùng subset lệnh tương ứng.	Đang có keyspace ~* (đọc/ghi key deploy của đội khác, key admin). Các lệnh CONFIG/DEBUG có thể bị lạm dụng phá vỡ hệ thống.
deployment-center	~deploy_challenge_*, ~active_deploys_team_*; Lệnh get/set/del/expire/zadd/zrem.	Có thể đọc key auth, hint, challenge. Lệnh MONITOR có thể bị dùng để theo dõi (spy) traffic toàn hệ thống.
deployment-consumer	~deploy_challenge_*, ~active_deploys_team_*; Lệnh get/exists/ttl (Chỉ đọc).	Dư thừa nghiêm trọng: Consumer chỉ cần quyền đọc nhưng đang có quyền ghi và xóa toàn bộ keyspace.
deployment-listener	~deploy_challenge_*, ~active_deploys_team_*; Lệnh get/set/del/expire/zadd/zrem.	Lệnh FLUSHALL đang khả dụng, rủi ro bị xóa trắng toàn bộ dữ liệu thi đấu nếu service bị chiếm quyền.
challenge-gateway	~fctf:gateway:* (chỉ rate-limiting); Lệnh incr/decr/hget/hset/eval.	Đang có keyspace ~*. Kẻ tấn công qua gateway có thể đọc toàn bộ auth/deploy key. Lệnh SHUTDOWN có thể làm sập hệ thống.
[default user]	Không cần tồn tại.	User dự phòng không được kiểm soát. Bất kỳ kết nối nào có mật khẩu đều được cấp toàn quyền.
c, Đánh giá Phân quyền Lưu trữ Chia sẻ (NFS)
Hiện có 5 PersistentVolume đang mount NFS mà không có các tùy chọn bảo mật cần thiết, tạo ra nguy cơ thực thi mã độc từ shared storage.
Bảng phân tích điểm yếu phân quyền NFS:
Interface (Pod → NFS)	Yêu cầu tối thiểu theo nghiệp vụ	Quyền dư thừa hiện tại & Rủi ro
start-challenge-workflow	Đọc Dockerfile & source code để build; không cần quyền thực thi.	Thiếu noexec. Nguy cơ thực thi malware bị chèn vào NFS dưới quyền container trong pipeline CI/CD.
up-challenge-workflow	Đọc/ghi artifact build; không cần quyền thực thi.	Thiếu noexec. Nguy cơ thực thi binary độc hại trong quá trình push challenge image.
contestant-be	Đọc/ghi file attachment; chỉ cần truy cập thư mục /uploads.	Thiếu ACL. Có thể truy cập trái phép thư mục /challenges chứa Dockerfile/flag chưa được công khai.
admin-mvc	Quản lý file attachment qua /uploads.	Thiếu ACL. Truy cập chéo được thư mục /workflow và /challenges của các service khác.
filebrowser	Quản lý file trong phạm vi cấp phép; không cần quyền thực thi.	Thiếu noexec và ACL. File tải lên có thể bị thực thi trái phép.
Bất kỳ Pod nào (UID 0)	Không áp dụng.	Thiếu root_squash. Container chạy quyền root có thể thay đổi ownership/permission file của service khác.

d, Đánh giá Bảo mật Orchestration (Argo Workflows & Monitoring)
Bảng phân tích điểm yếu hạ tầng vận hành:
Mức độ	Giao diện liên quan	Tóm tắt Vấn đề Trọng tâm
Nghiêm trọng	Tất cả service → MariaDB	Dùng chung tài khoản ctfd-username với ALL PRIVILEGES. Xâm nhập 1 service = chiếm toàn bộ database.
Nghiêm trọng	root@% → MariaDB
	Mở truy cập remote superuser. Rủi ro leo thang đặc quyền toàn bộ hệ thống từ bất kỳ pod nào.
Cao	Tất cả service → Redis
ACL bị tắt, keyspace ~*, full command. Xâm nhập 1 service = chiếm toàn bộ state, điểm số của giải đấu.
Cao	deployment-consumer → DB & Redis
Service có nhu cầu quyền hạn nhỏ nhất hệ thống nhưng đang mang mức đặc quyền cao nhất (dư thừa nghiêm trọng).
Cao	Workflow pod → NFS
Thiếu tùy chọn noexec. Nguy cơ upload và thực thi malware len lỏi vào CI/CD pipeline.
Cao	Service → Argo Server
Dữ liệu và Token truyền tải dạng plaintext qua HTTP. Dễ bị sniffing đánh cắp quyền control plane.
Trung bình	challenge-gateway → Redis
Nhu cầu chỉ là rate-limit nhưng đang đọc được toàn bộ auth key và deploy key của hệ thống.
Trung bình	contestant-be → NFS
Vắng bóng ACL, tạo điều kiện đọc được thư mục chứa flag và Dockerfile chưa được công khai.
Trung bình	Argo Controller	Cấu hình cho phép mọi template chạy tự do. Nếu lộ token, có thể thực thi tùy ý.

3.7. Remaining weaknesses of the FCTF system
Although previous versions of the FCTF system have met part of the requirements for organizing and operating information security competitions, and achieved some positive results in practical deployment at Secathon 2025, the overall assessment process from Version 1 to Version 3 shows that the system still has some limitations in architecture, performance, security, scalability and stability. Fully identifying these weaknesses is an important basis for the research, design and completion process of the system in Version 4.
3.7.1. Application Logic & Data Integrity Issues
3.7.1.1. Weakness in the Health Check mechanism during challenge deployment (IS-2)
In the current F-CTF system, the challenge environment initialization process is coordinated through Argo Workflows. When contestants perform the start challenge operation, the workflow will proceed with deployment steps such as creating pods, configuring services and returning the connection string (URL or host:port) to contestants immediately after the workflow ends with Succeeded status. However, the current success status of the workflow only reflects that the infrastructure-level deployment steps have been completed, but does not ensure that the application inside the pod is ready to serve real access.
To illustrate more clearly the deployment flow and the health check issue, the Sequence Diagram below describes in detail the process from when the contestant presses the "Start Challenge" button until the contestant can access the challenge environment, including interactions between Contestant Portal, Contestant BE, Deployment Center, Argo Controller, K8s API Server and Challenge Pod. The diagram highlights the core weakness: the system returns "Challenge Ready" to the contestant when the container is Running, but the application inside has not completed the initialization process, leading to Connection Refused status when the contestant tries to access immediately.
 Figure 9: Sequence diagram for Health Check Mechanism
By default, Kubernetes considers a pod running when the container inside has started and does not crash immediately. If there is no health check mechanism, Kubernetes cannot determine whether the container is truly ready to receive requests or not. This issue can be seen more clearly in applications that require long startup time where processing can only be performed after initialization is complete.
In addition, the current watcher code only relies on container-level status ("ContainerStatuses[].Ready") to determine that the pod is ready, instead of checking pod-level status ("PodCondition Ready=True"). According to Kubernetes Pod Lifecycle, a pod is only considered Ready when all containers inside are ready and readiness probes (if any) all return success. Checking only container status while ignoring pod condition makes the system possibly confuse between the container having started and the application being ready to serve.
Due to the lack of health check mechanism and inaccurate watcher logic, the system may return the connection string to contestants while the pod is still in internal startup status (initializing). The consequence is that when contestants access the provided address immediately, the web service has not responded or returns an error, and only after a certain time the web page can be accessed normally. From the user’s perspective, this creates a feeling that the system is operating unstably or has errors, although technically the deployment process is still proceeding correctly.
The table below illustrates the asynchrony between states in the pod startup process and the impact on user experience:
State	Symptom	Impact
Pod version = Running	Container has started	UI shows "Running"
ContainerStatuses[].Ready = true	Container reports ready	Watcher emits RUNNING
PodCondition Ready = false	Pod not yet ready	Service does not accept traffic
Contestant connects immediately	Request fail/timeout	User perceives a system error
Table 2: Effect of not having health check
The core cause of this issue lies in the current system not applying Kubernetes readiness probe mechanism to determine the real readiness status of the application. Implementing these probes requires the application in the container to provide a health check endpoint (for example /health or /ready) for Kubernetes to check. However, in the context of the system allowing many challenges developed by different authors, requiring all Challenge Writers to self-build and maintain health check endpoints significantly increases complexity and burden for question setters.
Therefore, the current system is inferring the service readiness status based on the completion status of infrastructure-level deployment steps, specifically the pod/container being successfully created and not falling into error status during startup. However, in Kubernetes, this status only reflects that the process in the container has been started, but does not guarantee that the application inside has completed the internal initialization process and is capable of receiving requests. Equating these two statuses creates a weakness in correctness in the deployment process, leading to asynchrony between the system’s “challenge ready” notification and the actual service accessibility. Although this limitation does not directly cause serious security risks, it significantly affects contestant experience and operation efficiency, especially in competitions with many simultaneous environment initialization requirements.
3.7.1.2. Recording contestant behavior logs depends on the client side (IS-3)
The system implements an Action Log mechanism to record important contestant behaviors during competition participation, such as opening challenges, opening hints, starting challenges or performing operations related to the challenge. These records are stored in the database and can be used for monitoring activities, analyzing user behavior or serving investigation when incidents occur.
However, the current logging mechanism depends on the frontend, in which the client actively sends a saveLog API request to the backend to save activity events. Since the frontend is outside the direct control scope of the system, users can modify client code, block requests or spoof log content. This makes log data not guarantee integrity and reliability, putting the system at risk of missing, inaccurate or manipulated actual contestant behaviors.
 
Figure 10: Sequence diagram for Saving log
3.7.2. Infrastructure & Configuration Weaknesses
3.7.2.1. Security risk from exposing challenge ports directly (IS-4)
Although F-CTF version 3 has switched to exposing challenges through Ingress and domain to enhance security in standard configuration, the current system still has a serious network security weakness in certain deployment scenarios, especially for challenges with special characteristics such as pwn challenges. In these cases, the challenge pod is forced to be exposed directly to the outside through the physical network ports of the node (for example NodePort or HostPort), instead of going through the centralized coordination and access control layer.
This approach leads to breaking the necessary isolation model. NodePort ports are usually in a fixed and easily guessable range (30000 - 32767), making them quickly scannable by popular tools. Therefore, a contestant can completely scan open ports on the node to detect and illegally access challenge pods that do not belong to their rights.
The consequence of this vulnerability is not only unauthorized access, but also opens up many attack scenarios that directly affect the fairness and reliability of the competition. A contestant can exploit other teams’ challenges early to obtain flags, intentionally send payloads to hang or sabotage services, interrupt the competition process, or interfere with the status of the challenge environment. In the context of pwn challenges that usually contain serious vulnerabilities by design, allowing uncontrolled network access further increases the risk of abuse.
In addition, because these connections go straight into the node and challenge pod, they completely bypass border layer protections such as Cloudflare and Nginx Ingress, including access filtering mechanisms, rate limiting and user identity recording. This makes the system not only lack network access control but also encounter difficulties in tracing the origin of violations or cheating behaviors. In worse cases, a successfully exploited challenge pod can become the starting point for lateral movement attacks to other pods or internal services in the same Kubernetes cluster.
3.7.2.2. Challenge pod isolation and privilege shortcomings (IS-5)
In the F-CTF system, each challenge is dynamically deployed through Kubernetes resources based on configuration files in YAML form, called challenge deployment templates. This template plays the role of a detailed technical description, regulating how the challenge is initialized in the cluster, including execution environment, network configuration, process permissions, resource access scope and accompanying security constraints.
Every challenge when deployed follows the same template, therefore the template becomes the central factor determining the safety level of the entire system. If the template is not tightly designed, challenges created from that template will have the ability to access or interact beyond the necessary scope, increasing risks to internal components of the system.
Pod Security Standards Framework
To evaluate the safety level of pod configuration, Kubernetes provides Pod Security Standards2 - a clearly defined set of policy levels to manage security aspects of pod specifications. Pod Security Standards define three main policy levels from the most open to the most restrictive:
●	Privileged: Completely open policy, without any constraints, usually used for system-level workloads managed by trusted users
●	Baseline: Minimum restrictive policy to prevent known privilege escalations, allowing default Pod configuration with basic safety level
●	Restricted: Strictest policy, complying with current best practices on Pod hardening, recommended for security-critical applications or lower-trust user environments
Baseline Policy Requirements
Baseline policy includes basic controls to prevent known privilege escalations:
●	Host Namespaces: Prohibit sharing host network, host PID, or host IPC namespaces
●	Privileged Containers: Prohibit containers running in privileged mode
●	Capabilities: Limit Linux capabilities that can be added
●	HostPath Volumes: Prohibit direct access to host filesystem
●	Host Ports: Prohibit or limit binding to host ports
●	AppArmor/SELinux: Require use of RuntimeDefault or allowed profiles
●	Seccomp: Must not be set to Unconfined
●	Sysctls: Only allow "safe" sysctls that have been namespaced
Restricted Policy Requirements
The Restricted policy is built upon the Baseline foundation and incorporates more stringent controls:
●	Volume Types: Only allow safe volume types (configMap, secret, emptyDir, persistentVolumeClaim, etc.)
●	Privilege Escalation: Must set allowPrivilegeEscalation: false
●	Running as Non-root: Must run containers with non-root user
●	Non-zero User ID: User ID must not be 0
●	Seccomp Profile: Must be explicitly configured to RuntimeDefault or Localhost
●	Capabilities Dropping: Must drop ALL capabilities, only add back NET_BIND_SERVICE if needed
●	Read-only Filesystem: Best practice requires root filesystem in read-only mode
Evaluation of Current Challenge Template according to Pod Security Standards
The current challenge deployment template uses Kubernetes’ default container runtime (runc), providing process-level isolation through Linux namespaces and cgroups. However, this mechanism still relies on the shared kernel model, in which the container shares the node host’s kernel directly and has no additional sandbox layer. When compared with Pod Security Standards, the template has not fully enforced constraints on process privileges and resource isolation, leading to many serious violations as detailed in the table below:
Pod Security Control	Configuration in Old Template	Violation and Impact
Running as Non-root		runAsNonRoot and runAsUser not enforced	Violates Restricted policy requirement. Containers can run with root user (UID 0), allowing process full privileges in container namespace, creating conditions for privilege escalation and container breakout
Seccomp Profile		No securityContext.seccompProfile or pod-level seccompProfile configured	Violates both Baseline and Restricted policies. Pod runs with Unconfined seccomp profile, allowing containers to execute all syscalls including dangerous syscalls such as ptrace, mount, reboot, significantly increasing attack surface at kernel level
Read-only Root Filesystem		Not configured	Violates defense-in-depth best practice. Containers can write to root filesystem, allowing attackers to modify binaries, install malware, persist backdoors, and tamper with system files
AppArmor / SELinux	No appArmorProfile or seLinuxOptions configured	Violates Baseline policy on mandatory access control. Lacks kernel-level security module to enforce fine-grained access controls, no additional protection layer against unauthorized file access and process interactions
Network Policy	No NetworkPolicy, pods have unrestricted network access	Violates zero-trust networking principle and Network Security category of K8s Security Checklist. Challenge pods can communicate with any pods/services in the cluster, including databases, control plane APIs, and internal services, creating conditions for lateral movement
Host Ports Exposure	Service type NodePort exposes challenge via node ports	Violates least privilege principle in network exposure. Although not directly violating Baseline policy on hostPort field, exposing via NodePort bypasses ingress controls and allows direct access from external networks without authentication/authorization layers
Runtime Class	Uses default runtime (runc), no sandbox isolation	Does not comply with Pod Placement best practice on sandboxed runtimes for untrusted workloads. Containers run directly on host kernel with kernel-sharing, increasing risk of kernel exploits affecting host and other containers on the same node
Pod Security Admission		Namespace has no labels	Does not enforce Pod Security Standards at namespace level. Lacks automated admission control to validate and reject pods violating security policies, completely dependent on manual review and operator discipline
Table 3: Table Evaluating Violations of Pod Security Standards of Old Template
When evaluating overall according to the Pod Security Standards Framework, the old challenge deployment template shows uneven compliance between policy levels, with some controls implemented correctly but still having many serious shortcomings.
On the positive side, the template has complied with some important controls of Baseline policy. Specifically, the template does not use dangerous privileged features such as Host Namespaces Sharing (hostNetwork, hostPID, hostIPC are all not enabled), does not allow Privileged Containers (privileged: false), and does not mount HostPath Volumes to access the host filesystem. The template also partially complies with Restricted policy requirements through disabling Privilege Escalation (allowPrivilegeEscalation: false) and dropping all Linux Capabilities (drop: ["ALL"]). In addition, disabling automountServiceAccountToken prevents containers from accessing the Kubernetes API server, minimizing the risk of privilege escalation through service account tokens.
However, although there are some basic compliance points, the template still does not achieve full compliance with any policy level of Pod Security Standards due to the following serious violations:
For Baseline Policy (minimum level), the template violates 3 important controls:
●	Seccomp Profile is not explicitly configured, leading to the pod running with Unconfined profile, allowing execution of all dangerous syscalls such as ptrace, mount, reboot
●	AppArmor/SELinux is not configured, lacking mandatory access control at kernel level
●	Pod Security Admission is not activated at namespace level, lacking automated enforcement mechanism
For Restricted Policy (recommended for untrusted workloads), in addition to 2 inherited violations from Baseline (Seccomp and AppArmor), the template also violates 1 additional serious control:
●	Running as Non-root is not enforced (runAsNonRoot and runAsUser are commented out), allowing containers to run with root user (UID 0) and have full privileges in container namespace
Besides violating Pod Security Standards, the template also does not comply with important security best practices:
●	Read-only Root Filesystem is not configured, allowing attackers to modify binaries and persist backdoors
●	Network Policy is not established, allowing unrestricted network access to every pod/service in the cluster
●	Host Ports Exposure via NodePort bypasses ingress controls and authentication layers
●	Runtime Class uses default runtime (runc) instead of sandboxed runtime for untrusted workloads
These unapplied security configurations, such as allowing containers to run with root privileges, not restricting system calls, and not controlling network access between pods, have significantly increased the attack surface of the system. In case a challenge pod is compromised, the attacker can take advantage of root privileges to perform dangerous behaviors, exploit operating system vulnerabilities, or move to other pods and services in the cluster. When many important protection layers are not established, the system’s multi-layer defense capability is reduced, thereby increasing the risk of serious attacks occurring.
3.7.2.3. Argo Workflow becomes unresponsive when submitting a large number of deploy requests exceeding k3s cluster resources (IS-6)
a, Problem Description
During the operation of the F-CTF system, the K3s cluster and Argo Workflows encountered serious hanging (hung/deadlock) status when under high load, affecting the processing capability and stability of the entire system.
b, Kubernetes Security Checklist Reference
Checklist Category	Checklist Item	Requirement
Pod Security	Memory limit is set for the workloads with a limit equal or inferior to the request.	Every pod must have resource limits
Pod Security	CPU limits might be set on sensitive workloads.	CPU limits for sensitive workloads
Pod Placement	Pod placement is done in accordance with the tiers of sensitivity of the application.	Separate pods by sensitivity level
Pod Placement

	Sensitive applications are running isolated on nodes or with specific sandboxed runtimes.	Control plane isolated from workload
Admission Controllers	ResourceQuotaEnforces resource quotas to prevent over-usage of resources.	Limit resource usage
Table 4: Kubernetes Security Checklist Reference
c, Test Cases
The incident was reproduced with the following system information:
●	Operating system (OS): Ubuntu 22.04.5 LTS (Kernel: 6.8.0-1045-gcp)
●	Kubernetes distribution: K3s v1.34.3+k3s1
●	Container Runtime: containerd://2.1.5-k3s1
●	Master node configuration: 4 vCPU / 16GB RAM / 50GB SSD
●	Worker node configuration: 2 worker nodes (Total: 8 vCPU / 32GB RAM / 40GB SSD)
Total number of Requests: 1000 users with 1000 request start challenge.
d, Observed Issues
The system encountered the following abnormal manifestations, appearing simultaneously and accumulating over time:
d.1. Argo Workflows Stuck:
During testing, the number of workflows in "Running" status did not complete for a long time, although the system currently allows a maximum of 30 workflows running simultaneously. New workflows were submitted but did not start execution, falling into indefinite pending status because old workflows were still in running status and there was no timeout mechanism to automatically end them. The Argo UI interface displayed workflows in "deadlock" status with infinitely long running time, while the system had no ability to self-recover by terminating or deleting these deadlock workflows. The final result of the test showed only 1 workflow succeeded (SUCCEEDED), 30 workflows still running (RUNNING), and the remaining 969 workflows in waiting status (PENDING) out of a total of 1000 submitted workflows.
 
Figure 11: Argo workflow Running after ~9m

 
Figure 12: Argo workflow Running after ~30m

 
Figure 13: Argo workflow Running after ~1h

 
Figure 14: Argo workflow Pending infinitely with 469/1000 Pending
d.2. Cleanup Operations Failure:
The cleanup CronJob, designed to automatically clean up resources periodically, did not run according to the configured schedule, with the number of missed schedules increasing over time. When the CronJob attempted to create cleanup jobs, the created pods all fell into Pending status and could not execute due to lack of available resources in the cluster. As a result, old challenge pods were not cleaned up and continued to accumulate in the cluster, leading to resource quotas being exceeded, preventing the creation of any new pods in the system.
 
Figure 15: CronJob cleaning cannot run
d.3. Business impact:
 Figure 16: Health check timeout for Contestant challenge
From the end-user perspective, contestants still had the ability to send new start challenge requests, however they continuously received timeout notifications. In reality, these requests were still sent to Argo for processing, while a series of other workflows were still in pending status, waiting to be executed. Running challenges were negatively affected and at risk of unwanted termination. Argo continued to wait for running workflows to run indefinitely, leading to subsequent requests not being processed. The entire workflow automation process was completely interrupted, requiring manual intervention and cluster restart, causing significant downtime and seriously affecting user experience as well as system reliability.
e, Root Cause Analysis
The incident originated from the combination of five main issues related to resource scheduling, workflow configuration, and resource priority & preemption mechanism in the K3s environment.
(1) Allowing Workload to run on K3s Server Node
K3s architecture characteristics:
Unlike standard Kubernetes, K3s uses the term "server node" instead of "master node" or "control plane node". The server node in K3s is designed with specific features, including running all control plane components (API server, scheduler, controller-manager) in a single process, by default configured as schedulable allowing regular application workloads to be deployed directly on the server node, integrated ready kubelet along with container runtime (containerd) and CNI plugin, and containing datastore in SQLite form for single-server configuration or embedded etcd for high availability setup.
Current status description:
The current cluster is operating with K3s default configuration, allowing regular application workloads, including both challenge pods and workflow pods, to be scheduled and executed directly on the server node. The server node is running core components in a single k3s server process, including kube-apiserver playing the role of the cluster’s main API server, kube-scheduler performing pod scheduling function, kube-controller-manager managing controllers, SQLite or embedded etcd taking the role of cluster state datastore, along with supporting components such as CoreDNS, metrics-server and service load balancer. In particular, Kubernetes by default allows Pods to consume nearly the entire node capacity, unless the administrator proactively reserves resources for system components (Reserve Compute Resources for System Daemons3).
To illustrate more clearly the mechanism of the incident when the system receives 1000 simultaneous requests, the Sequence Diagram below describes in detail the processing flow from when the contestant sends burst requests, through the Argo Server and Argo Workflow Controller processing, K8s API Server and Scheduler attempting to allocate resources, until the system falls into deadlock status. The diagram highlights four important stages: Burst Requests (1000 concurrent requests), Resource Exhaustion (workflows deadlock waiting for pods), System Stuck & Deadlock (cleanup job cannot run), and Contestant Impact (users waiting indefinitely). The diagram also clearly shows the core weaknesses including workflow pods with zero resource requests always accepted by the scheduler, challenge pods unable to be scheduled due to the cluster having exhausted resources, and cleanup mechanism being deadlocked due to no priority class to preempt lower priority pods.
 Figure 17: Argo Workflow Stuck When Exceeding Resources Sequence diagram 
Incident occurrence mechanism: Because K3s consolidates all control plane components in a single process, when system load increases and application workloads consume resources on the server node, a chain of events occurs in the following order. First, resource contention occurs on the server node, in which challenge pods and workflow pods compete for CPU and memory resources with the k3s server process. Because the k3s server process has no separate resource guarantees, all components in this process are affected simultaneously. Next, the control plane begins performance degradation, with kube-scheduler lacking CPU to handle pod placement decisions, kube-controller-manager experiencing delays in reconciliation loops, and API server responding slowly or timing out. Finally, cascading failures occur, in which the scheduler cannot schedule new pods, existing pods are not reconciled correctly, failures in the resource cleanup process lead to resource leaks, and the entire cluster falls into unresponsive or partially functional status.
(2) Start-challenge Workflow does not declare Resource Request and Timeout
Resource scheduling characteristics in K3s: K3s uses the standard kube-scheduler of Kubernetes, therefore the behavior of scheduling pods with zero resource requests is completely the same as standard K8s. Pods with resources.requests equal to 0 are always considered suitable to be created on any node, while the scheduler does not reserve resources for these pods. This leads to the node being able to be seriously over-committed with many zero-request pods, and there is no mechanism to prevent pod creation when the cluster is overloaded.
Current status description:
The start-challenge Workflow in Argo Workflows is defined with uncontrolled characteristics, specifically resources.requests.cpu set to 0 (no CPU requirement), resources.requests.memory also 0 (no memory requirement), and no activeDeadlineSeconds or other timeout mechanisms configured.
Incident occurrence mechanism in K3s:
The incident process begins from the workflow pod creation stage, in which the Argo controller creates the workflow pod with zero resource requests, causing the K3s scheduler to always accept this pod because it does not require resources, and the workflow pod is scheduled immediately, usually on the server node if there is no taint. Next, in the challenge pod deployment attempt stage, the workflow pod executes the kubectl apply command to create the challenge pod, however the challenge pod has actual resource requests, for example 100m CPU and 128Mi memory. In conditions where the cluster has exhausted resources, the K3s scheduler cannot find a suitable node and the challenge pod falls into Pending status. Because the workflow does not terminate, the workflow pod continues running because the process does not crash, Argo still considers the workflow "in progress", there is no timeout mechanism to fail the workflow, and the workflow waits indefinitely for the challenge pod to be scheduled. Finally, a resource exhaustion spiral occurs, in which many workflow instances accumulate in running status, the Argo controller consumes CPU and memory to track these workflows, the database (etcd or SQLite) contains state of hundreds of pending workflows, and the K3s server process is overloaded due to many watch connections and state queries.
(3) Cleanup CronJob cannot execute when Cluster lacks resources
Resource scheduling and priority in K3s: K3s fully supports Kubernetes PriorityClass and preemption mechanisms, however there are some important differences. Default scheduler behavior in K3s is completely the same as standard K8s, but there are no built-in additional priority classes besides system-cluster-critical and system-node-critical. Preemption only occurs in cases where there is a higher priority pod and no available resources, while K3s server components are protected by system priorities.
Current status description: Cleanup CronJob is designed to automatically clean up challenge pods periodically. In a cluster resource exhaustion situation, all nodes have reserved full CPU and memory, no capacity left for new pods. When the CronJob controller creates a cleanup pod in this condition, the cleanup pod cannot be scheduled due to lack of resources.
Incident occurrence mechanism: The incident process begins from the CronJob trigger stage, in which the Kubernetes CronJob controller (running inside the k3s server process) creates a new Job, the Job controller then creates a pod for the cleanup task, and this pod is submitted to the scheduler queue. Next is scheduling failure, when the scheduler evaluates all nodes and sees that all report insufficient allocatable resources, leading to pod status changing to Pending with reason Unschedulable and event FailedScheduling with message "0/N nodes available: insufficient cpu/memory". During this stage, preemption does not occur because the cleanup pod has no PriorityClass or has low priority, while challenge pods and workflow pods also have no PriorityClass, leading to all having default priority equal to 0. The scheduler therefore cannot decide which pod should be evicted, and the cleanup pod continues pending without preemption occurring. Finally, the system falls into deadlock state, in which challenge pods occupy resources, cleanup pod cannot run to clean up these challenge pods, and resources are not released.
Core cause: The core causes include no PriorityClass hierarchy to distinguish workload criticality, scheduler not authorized to preempt lower priority pods, lack of resource reservation for critical system tasks, and no guarantee mechanisms for cleanup operations.
(4) Argo Workflows timeout mechanisms do not work accurately when experiencing burst requests
Characteristics of Argo timeout mechanisms: Argo Workflows timeout mechanisms, including activeDeadlineSeconds, ttlStrategy and podGC, do not operate as real-time timers. Instead, timeout checking is performed through the Argo controller’s processing loop (controller reconciliation loop). In each loop, the controller will scan the list of workflows in the cluster, compare the current time with the workflow start time plus the deadline time. If a workflow is detected to have exceeded the allowed time, the controller will send a signal to terminate the corresponding workflow pod. Therefore, the actual timeout time depends on the processing speed of the controller.
Current status description: In the test with 1000 start challenge requests sent almost simultaneously, although activeDeadlineSeconds was configured as 120 seconds, many workflows in reality were not terminated after 2 minutes as expected. Instead, some workflows continued to exist in running status for much longer, in some cases up to about 20 minutes before being stopped.
Mechanism leading to timeout delay: When a large number of workflows are created at the same time, the system must process hundreds of workflow events in a short time. Creating many Workflow CRDs simultaneously increases the load on the API Server and Kubernetes datastore (etcd or SQLite). At the same time, the Argo controller must put these workflows into its internal processing queue (workqueue). Because the controller processes workflows in the queue step by step, when the number of workflows is too large, some workflows that have exceeded the deadline time but have not yet been checked by the controller in time. During this time, the workflow pods continue to exist until the controller processes them in the next loop.
Main cause: The main cause of this phenomenon is that Argo Workflows timeout mechanism is only checked when the controller processes the workflow in its loop, instead of being triggered by an accurate real-time timer. When the system receives burst requests with hundreds or thousands of workflows created at the same time, the controller’s processing queue becomes too long, causing timeout checking to be significantly delayed. Therefore, under high load conditions, workflow timeout is only ensured at the eventually enforced level, meaning the workflow will ultimately still be terminated when exceeding the configured time, but the actual time may be significantly later than the original timeout value. This increases the number of running workflows in the cluster and prolongs the system recovery time after large load periods.
(5) Orphaned pods due to Pending Workflows not managed by TTL
Characteristics of Argo timeout/TTL for Pending workflows: The activeDeadlineSeconds and ttlStrategy mechanisms in Argo Workflows are only effectively enforced after the workflow has changed to Running or Completed status. Workflows still in the Pending queue have no corresponding waiting time limit and can exist indefinitely in the workqueue when the cluster lacks resources.
Current status description:
When the contestant sends a start challenge request, the backend system records the request status into Redis with short TTL (for example 5 minutes) to manage the session lifecycle. At the same time, the corresponding Argo Workflow is submitted but falls into Pending status due to the cluster lacking resources. When the TTL in Redis expires, the session record is deleted and the backend considers the request expired, no longer tracking it. However the Pending workflow in Argo still exists independently and does not recognize that the corresponding application session has been invalidated.
Incident occurrence mechanism:
After the cluster is partially released of resources (due to manual cleanup or some workflows ending), the Argo controller continues to dispatch the Pending workflows in workqueue order. These orphaned workflows still run normally and create challenge pods even though there is no longer a valid session in Redis. The pods created by these orphaned workflows are called orphaned pods: they exist in reality in the cluster, consume CPU/memory, but have no valid owner/session in the backend’s business logic.
Consequences:
First, orphaned pods consume useless resources, directly reducing capacity for subsequent valid requests. Second, because there is no corresponding session in Redis, the cleanup CronJob and cleanup mechanisms based on business status do not recognize these pods as objects needing processing, causing them to possibly exist for a long time until manual intervention. Third, the contestant of the original request who received timeout at the frontend may retry and create a new valid workflow, while the ghost pod from the old request is still running, leading to the possibility of duplicate resource occupation for the same user. Finally, through many overload and recovery cycles, orphaned pods accumulate and create a degradation loop, in which each time the cluster recovers it is followed by a new batch of orphaned pods, quickly pushing the cluster back to resource exhaustion status.
Core cause:
The core cause lies in the phase difference in lifecycle between the two status systems: Redis manages sessions by independent TTL at the application layer, while Argo Workflows have no linking mechanism to react when the corresponding session has expired. The lack of TTL or queue timeout for Pending workflows creates a serious control gap in sudden load periods, leading to the possibility of orphaned workflows and orphaned pods occurring after the recovery phase.
3.7.2.4. Security Configuration Vulnerabilities (IS-7)
To ensure the security and reliability of the F-CTF system before putting it into operation, the team performed a security check process based on the Kubernetes Security Checklist1 - the official document provided by Kubernetes and popular integrated testing tools such as Trivy and Kubescape.
The Kubernetes Security Checklist is a comprehensive baseline checklist, including essential security check criteria for systems running on the Kubernetes platform. The Security Checklist for Kubernetes is a set of criteria and recommendations aimed at ensuring the system is configured according to the best security practices. The checklist does not aim to replace in-depth security measures, but serves as an initial reference framework to evaluate the safety level of the system. The checklist is built based on the practical experience of the Kubernetes community, cybersecurity organizations and cloud service providers. The checklist content is continuously updated to suit the development of the platform. This document is divided into main groups:
Category	Description
Authentication & Authorization	Check authentication mechanism, RBAC permissions
Network Security	Check NetworkPolicy, ingress/egress control, API exposure
Pod Security	Check Pod Security Standards, seccomp, resource limits
Pod Placement	Check node isolation, taint/toleration, runtime class
Secrets	Check encryption at rest, secret injection
Images	Check image security, unprivileged user
Admission Controllers	Check admission webhook, policy enforcement
Table 5: Kubernetes security check categories
To ensure comprehensive security effectiveness, we believe it is necessary to combine with automated evaluation tools that have been developed to strictly comply with safety criteria from security experts.
Regarding popular Kubernetes security standards:
●	CIS Kubernetes Benchmark: A standard set issued by the Center for Internet Security, providing safe configuration guidelines for components in the Kubernetes system. This standard is widely used in compliance assessment and security audit activities. The content focuses on protecting the control plane, nodes, RBAC mechanisms, audit logging and secret management, thereby helping to minimize risks arising from configuration errors.
●	NSA Kubernetes Hardening Guide: A hardening guideline document built by NSA and CISA, focusing on practical defense measures in container and cloud-native environments. This guide emphasizes reducing the attack surface, protecting the software supply chain, controlling access and enhancing monitoring to increase resilience against advanced threats.
●	Kubernetes Pod Security Standards (PSS): Security standard for Pods, including three levels: Privileged, Baseline and Restricted. In which, the Restricted level is recommended for production environments to limit container privileges and enhance system safety.
Based on the checklists and security standards presented, the FCTF system is implemented combining automated evaluation tools to check compliance level and detect early weaknesses in the operation process. In which, the two main tools used are Trivy and Kubescape, which are highly evaluated by the Kubernetes and information security community for reliability and check coverage:
●	Trivy: an open-source tool specialized in scanning security vulnerabilities and configuration deviations in container and Kubernetes environments. In the FCTF system, Trivy is used to perform scanning of published security vulnerabilities (CVE) in container images, detect Kubernetes configurations that do not comply with CIS Kubernetes Benchmark, and check container permissions and potential risk settings. Through comparing scan results with recommendations from CIS Benchmark, Trivy supports identifying configuration points that have not yet met security standards, thereby serving as a basis for system adjustment and optimization.
●	Kubescape: a comprehensive safety evaluation tool for the Kubernetes system. Kubescape focuses on checking compliance with popular security frameworks such as NSA/CISA Kubernetes Hardening Guide, MITRE ATT&CK and CIS Benchmark. This tool allows analyzing the entire cluster according to standardized security control groups, evaluating the application of Pod Security Standards, as well as identifying risks related to privilege escalation, service network exposure and secret management. Thanks to analysis capability at both configuration and behavior levels, Kubescape helps provide an overall view of the system’s security status, supporting appropriate improvement measures.
To have an objective and quantitative evaluation of the security level of the F-CTF system, an automated security check round was performed on the K3s Production cluster and the overall current YAML files to configure the system. The check process used two standard tools: Kubescape and Trivy, and combined with Manual Test through the Kubernetes Security Checklist.
Below are the results on the security level of the Kubernetes Cluster through evaluation and checking:
3.7.2.4.1 Kubernetes Cluster Misconfigurations - Trivy Scan Results
Scan results from Trivy on "cron-job" and "deployment" (for example: "image: bitnamilegacy/kubectl:1.33.4", "admin-mvc", "challenge-gateway") detected many serious violations related to Security Context configuration:
●	Root Filesystem Write Access (KSV014 - High Severity): Most important containers such as "cleaner" (in CronJob cleanup), "admin-mvc", and "challenge-gateway" are running without enabling "readOnlyRootFilesystem: true" mode. This allows attackers if they gain control of the container to overwrite system files, install malware or modify runtime configuration.
●	Default Security Context (KSV118 - High Severity): Containers are running with default Security Context, meaning they have no restrictions on privileges (Privileges). Trivy warns that this allows root privileges inside the container ("runAsNonRoot" is not set), opening the risk of privilege escalation if the node kernel has vulnerabilities.
●	Outdated Base Images: Using old images such as "bitnamilegacy/kubectl" contains many unpatched CVEs in system libraries (OS Packages).
3.7.2.4.2 Kubernetes Cluster Misconfigurations - Kubescape Scan Results
The report from Kubescape when scanning the entire cluster showed a very low compliance rate (Compliance Score) in many important control groups (Controls) belonging to the NSA/CISA Kubernetes Hardening Framework:
●	Non-root containers (C-0013 - Failed 19/19): 100% of containers (19 resources) are running with root user (UID 0). This is the most serious violation, because if the attacker escapes the container, they will immediately have root rights on the host node.
●	Immutable container filesystem (C-0017 - Failed 19/19): The entire workload allows writing data to the filesystem, violating the immutable principle of containers.
●	Liveness & Readiness Probes (C-0056, C-0018): 18/19 workloads lack Readiness Probe and 19/19 lack Liveness Probe. This not only affects reliability but is also marked by Kubescape as a risk to readiness.
●	Network Policies (C-0030): The system lacks Network Policies to isolate communication between pods. Kubescape warns that Ingress/Egress is not blocked allowing compromised pods to freely scan and attack other pods in the cluster.
●	Privileged Service Accounts (C-0034): Many Service Accounts are automatically mounted tokens into pods, creating opportunities for attackers to steal tokens to interact with the Kubernetes API Server.
In summary, the F-CTF system is operating with "open" default configuration, lacking deep protection layers, making the attack surface very large.
3.7.3. Application & Code-level Weaknesses
3.7.3.1. N+1 Query Problem (IS-8)
A weakness in the system’s database query design was found to be the N+1 query problem. The N+1 problem occurs when the system performs 1 initial query to retrieve data, but then for each element performs N additional queries, causing the number of queries to increase suddenly according to input data, leading to serious performance degradation and increased API latency.
The image below describes this process more clearly:
 
Figure 18: Sequence diagram N+1 query problem
3.7.3.2. Dependency Injection Lifetime not suitable (IS-9)
In the old version, K8sService was registered with Scoped lifetime, causing each request to create a new service instance. When many contestants simultaneously start challenges, the system will generate many parallel connections to the Kubernetes API Server, easily causing overload and increasing memory usage, with potential risk of out-of-memory in long competitions.
In addition, the ScoreHelper class self-initializes DbContext in each method by injecting DbContextOptions and calling new AppDbContext(). This leads to creating many unnecessary DbContexts and database connections, putting pressure on the connection pool when the system processes many simultaneous requests. Although using is used, this design is still considered an anti-pattern in Entity Framework for high-load systems such as CTF.
3.7.3.3. Redis KEYS Command Blocking (IS-10)
In the old version, the system used the Redis KEYS command to query keys by pattern. This is a blocking command, causing Redis to have to scan the entire keyspace and pause processing other requests throughout the execution time. After obtaining the key list, the system continues to load all keys into memory and fetch all values in one StringGetAsync call.
This implementation causes many problems: the Redis server can be blocked for hundreds of milliseconds when the number of keys is large, causing the system to be temporarily “frozen”; loading all keys and values at once increases the risk of OutOfMemoryException and continuously triggers garbage collection; at the same time fetching data in one large request can cause timeout, exceed network buffer and have no ability to retry parts when errors occur. In addition, the system lacks an effective batch GET mechanism, forcing developers to handle many unnecessary round trips.
3.7.3.4. Missing CSRF Protection (IS-11)
In the current version of the F-CTF system, source code analysis shows that forms performing state-changing operations, especially administration and system configuration forms, have not implemented Cross-Site Request Forgery (CSRF) protection mechanism. Specifically, requests sent from client to server via POST method do not include CSRF token or request origin authentication mechanism, causing the server to be unable to verify the validity of the request.
The main cause of this issue stems from the request processing mechanism design depending entirely on session authentication based on cookies, while lacking the step to check request integrity on the server side. Because the browser automatically attaches the session cookie in every request to the same domain, the system by default considers requests with valid sessions as legitimate without checking whether that request was actually initiated from the system interface or from an external source.
In addition, in some endpoints, the CSRF checking mechanism is disabled or bypassed through bypass configurations during previous development to serve compatibility with old APIs or simplify the integration process. The existence of endpoints that do not apply CSRF protection has weakened the overall defense layer of the system and expanded the attack surface.
3.7.3.5. Polling-based Deployment Monitoring & Code Quality Issues (IS-12)
In the old version, the system monitored the deployment status of challenge instances through a periodic polling mechanism, implemented by the GetPodsJob class. Instead of listening to state change events from Kubernetes, this service continuously sends requests to the Kubernetes API Server at fixed intervals to check the status of Pods. This mechanism leads to many serious problems: creating a large amount of redundant requests to the API Server even when no changes occur, increasing event detection latency due to dependence on the poll cycle, and causing unnecessary pressure on Kubernetes infrastructure in competitions with many contestants simultaneously starting challenges.
In addition, source code analysis also detected many other code quality issues. The system has service classes with inconsistent naming, causing difficulties in maintenance and expansion. Some controllers take on too many responsibilities, violating the Single Responsibility principle. In addition, the lack of a centralized GlobalExceptionFilter causes error handling to be scattered and inconsistent between endpoints, with potential risk of leaking internal error information to the outside.
3.7.3.6. Contest-state and prerequisite logic gaps in challenge file download (IS-13.1)
In version 3 design, the challenge file download flow focused mainly on token validity and did not enforce contest-state and challenge-state checks as a strict mandatory gate in the same request path. This created a logic weakness where file access could be served outside the intended competition context.
Specifically, the download flow lacked consistent denial rules for cases such as contest not started, contest ended, challenge hidden, or prerequisite dependency not satisfied by the current team. In some scenarios, if prerequisite data was malformed or validation failed unexpectedly, the logic did not always fail closed.
As a result, this issue is not a pure path traversal issue, but a business authorization weakness: contestants could gain file access in conditions that should have been blocked by contest and challenge rules.
3.7.3.7. Path traversal risk in challenge file download due to path handling and NFS mount scope (IS-13.2)
In version 3 design, the function to download attached files of challenges only performed contestant token validation before returning file content, while path handling remained exposed to manipulation.
After receiving a valid token, a contestant could intercept the download request and modify the path parameter. If backend path checks were not strict enough, the request could be redirected to other files in the same storage area.
The root cause was the combination of two factors: path input not being tightly constrained to a canonical allowlisted location, and backend container mounting an overly broad NFS directory scope. When the service read files directly from user-influenced paths, contestants who inferred directory structures (for example: challenges/<challenge_name>/flag.txt, description.md, or other resources) could attempt unauthorized file reads.
This leads to Path Manipulation / Path Traversal risk, where file access is no longer constrained to the exact file scope intended by the system.
3.7.3.8. Race condition in flag submit flow, unlock hint and challenge lifecycle (IS-14)
During source code analysis of the old system, the team noticed some issues related to handling multiple simultaneous requests appearing in the ContestantBE, ResourceShared and DeploymentListener components. These issues are not only in a specific endpoint but affect consistency between Redis and database, the status of challenges running on Kubernetes infrastructure, as well as the fairness of the competition when many contestants perform operations at the same time.
In the unlock hint function, the old version used a locking mechanism to protect data write operations when opening hints. However, the steps to check prerequisite conditions, check current points and check hint status were performed before the lock was applied. This creates a short time window in which multiple requests can pass the check step before the system begins writing data. When two unlock requests are sent almost simultaneously from the same user or team on different backends, both requests can pass the check step and then sequentially write data. As a result, the system may open the same hint multiple times or deduct points inaccurately if the data status changes in the time interval between the check step and the write step.
For dynamic challenges, the challenge’s score will change based on the number of teams that have solved the challenge. In the old version, recalculating the point value was not controlled when multiple requests ran simultaneously. When many correct submit requests occurred almost at the same time, the processing threads could read the same value of the number of teams that had solved before performing the calculation and recording the new point value. This could cause the final challenge point value to be overwritten by the later processed request, leading to the score not reflecting the correct number of teams that had solved at that time.
In the challenge lifecycle management process, an issue can occur when the user stops the challenge and then starts it again in a very short time. When the stop request is sent, the system updates the challenge status in Redis to DELETING to mark that the resources on Kubernetes are being reclaimed. However, deleting the pod and deployment on Kubernetes does not happen immediately but requires a period of time to complete. If during this time the user sends a start challenge request, the system will begin the process of creating a new deployment and update the corresponding status to Redis. However, when Kubernetes completes deleting the old lifecycle resources, the component listening to events from Kubernetes will update the Redis status to STOPPED. Because these two operations occur close in time and there is no mechanism to ensure update order, the STOPPED status from the previous stop process may overwrite the new status of the start process. This causes Redis to store incorrect status compared to reality and leads to the challenge not being able to start successfully even though the user has performed a valid start operation.
3.7.3.9. DeploymentListener sequential processing causes event backlog under high load (IS-15)
In the old version, the DeploymentListener component was not optimally designed for cases where many Kubernetes events occurred simultaneously. Status change events of pods were processed almost sequentially in a main thread. When the number of pod changes was large in a short time, these events could be piled up in the processing queue. This increased latency when updating RUNNING, STOPPED or DELETING status to Redis and database, thereby increasing the possibility of asynchrony between the system status and the actual status of resources on Kubernetes.
3.7.4. Operational Efficiency & UX
3.7.4.1. Limitations in user experience on the Monitoring page and log viewing (IS-16)
a, Monitoring page
 
Figure 19: Admin Monitoring Page
Although the system’s Monitoring page provides the ability to observe the status of active challenges, the current interface still has some significant limitations in user experience. Specifically, the Monitoring page does not fully support filtering functions according to important criteria such as user, environment status or challenge type. When the number of challenge instances increases, administrators or supervisors must scroll and search manually, causing difficulty in quickly tracking incidents or abnormal environments during competition operation.
b,  Log viewing page 
 
Figure 20: Pod Challenge Log page
In addition, the challenge pod log viewing page does not have a mechanism to support proactive data refresh. Log content is only loaded at the time of page access, and when the pod status changes or new logs are generated, the user is forced to reload the entire page to view updated information. The lack of a refresh button or automatic log update mechanism interrupts the monitoring process and causes inconvenience in situations requiring quick response, for example when debugging deployment errors or handling incidents during the competition.
These limitations do not directly affect the correctness or security of the system, but reduce operation efficiency and real-time monitoring capability of Admin and Jury, especially in contests with many challenge instances running simultaneously. These are UX issues that need to be improved in subsequent versions to enhance the convenience and observability of the system.
c,  Request log tracking limitation
The current system does not provide a function to track logs of requests that contestants send to challenge instances, causing limitations in monitoring and evaluating participant behavior. The lack of this mechanism may affect the transparency of the competition as well as the ability to detect abnormal or cheating behaviors.
3.7.4.2. Limitations in analysis information on the Dashboard page (IS-17)
 
Figure 21: Dashboard screen
The current Dashboard page provides overview information about the competition, however the displayed metrics are still quite basic and do not bring much value for in-depth analysis. The system does not support important information per challenge such as success solve rate (%), average solve time, number of incorrect attempts or number of hint usages. The lack of these metrics makes it difficult for organizers to evaluate the difficulty level of challenges and detect abnormalities during the competition.
3.7.4.3. Lack of mechanism to support querying and aggregating award data (IS-18)
Currently the CTF system does not have a mechanism to support Admin querying, aggregating and exporting data to serve the award process in a flexible way. Determining teams or players who win prizes must be performed manually based on the overall scoreboard, with no ability to filter by multiple criteria or specific conditions such as: top team with highest points, top user, fastest solver. This increases processing time, easily causes errors in aggregating results and affects accuracy and transparency when organizing and announcing awards.
3.7.4.4. Limitations in User and Team management (IS-19)
 Figure 22: Manage User screen
 Figure 23: Manage Team screen
The User and Team management function in the current system still has many limitations. For Users, the information displayed in the management table is not complete, does not provide Admin with a clear view of whether the user has joined which team or not, and lacks filtering mechanisms according to conditions such as hidden, banned, country or other statuses. This causes difficulty in controlling and processing data when the number of users is large.
For the Team management function, the system also does not provide sufficient important information such as current number of members, team captain, and does not support filtering functions according to multiple criteria. These limitations reduce administration efficiency and cause Admin to spend a lot of time on manual operations during the competition organization process.
3.7.4.5. Limitations in managing Contestant Submissions (IS-20)
 Figure 24: Manage Submission screen
The Submission screen in the current system still has many limitations, directly affecting the ability of Admin to monitor and process submissions during the CTF organization process. The system does not support a mechanism to filter submissions by team, user or specific time period, causing difficulty when needing to trace abnormal behavior or check results of a certain group of subjects. For dynamic challenges, there is no function to reset score when adjustment or incident handling is needed, reducing flexibility in competition operation. In addition, the data export function still has errors when exporting files according to correct/incorrect submission status, specifically the system exports all submissions when admin wants to export correct submissions, this affects the accuracy of reports. The system also does not allow Admin to proactively mark submissions as correct or incorrect in special cases requiring manual intervention, leading to limitations in handling complaints or arising situations.
3.7.4.6. Lack of mechanism to store and trace Challenge Instance history (IS-21)
Currently the monitoring function in the system only tracks the status of Challenge Instances when they are in running status in the Kubernetes cluster. The system is lacking a persistent storage mechanism to record the actual lifecycle history of Pods containing challenges. The current action log records only stop at recording the operation of pressing the "Start/Stop" button on the contestant interface, but do not accurately reflect the initialization and end events of the Pod itself at the K8s infrastructure layer. As soon as an instance is stopped, all its log information will not be stored again. This lack leads to admin being unable to compare between user operations and the actual infrastructure status, for example unable to know whether an instance could not be deployed due to the user actively operating or infrastructure error, in addition in post-competition work, the organizers have no historical data to evaluate the stability of challenges (which challenge is most often deploy-error), reducing the ability to optimize the system for future CTF seasons.
3.7.4.7. Lack of Audit Log mechanism and system change tracing (IS-22)
Currently the system does not have an Audit Log mechanism to record and store the history of important operations performed by Admin, Jury or Challenge Writer. Changes related to user, team, challenge, system configuration or marking correct/incorrect submissions are not recorded in a centralized and systematic way. This leads to lack of tracing capability when incidents, disputes occur or when it is necessary to re-check the operation process of the organizers. The lack of search, filter and review history change mechanisms also reduces transparency, internal control capability and safety level in operating the CTF system.
3.7.4.8. Lack of mechanism to view Action Log for administrators (IS-23)
In the current system, the Action Log viewing function only allows Contestants to track their own actions and team members, while the competition Admin does not have a centralized access mechanism to monitor all user activities, leading to limitations in tracing incidents, detecting cheating and handling complaints. Important actions such as start challenge, stop challenge, correct or incorrect flag submission, unlock hint have not been centralized to serve checking and audit work.
3.7.4.9. Limitations in import & export function (IS-24)
The Import/Export function in admin config has not been working, affecting Admin’s data management efficiency. Specifically, the user, team, contest data export and import feature has not operated stably, generating errors during data processing, interrupting batch configuration operations. In addition, the system has not recorded and displayed detailed behaviors arising during import, for example cases of skipping (skip) existing users or teams, making it difficult for Admin to track processing results and compare data after performing operations. These limitations reduce transparency, increase data deviation risk and affect operation experience when organizing CTF competitions.
3.7.4.10. Limitations in bracket management and scoreboard display (IS-25)
The current system has allowed Admin to create and name brackets, however this function has not really demonstrated its value in actual competition operation. Specifically, although Admin can create brackets and assign contestants or teams to each bracket, the Contestant Portal does not integrate bracket data into the scoreboard interface at all. When viewing the ranking table, contestants only see the entire general list without the ability to filter or group according to the bracket they belong to. This makes the bracket feature meaningless in the context of competitions with many different segments, for example grouping by school, by school year, or by experience level. In addition, the system also does not have a configuration mechanism for Admin to control whether contestants are allowed to view results of other brackets or not, leading to a lack of flexibility in organizing competitions that require classifying competition subjects.
3.7.4.11. Lack of automated CI/CD process for system deployment (IS-26)
In previous versions, the F-CTF system did not have any automated continuous integration and deployment (CI/CD) process. When there were source code changes that needed to be put into the production environment, the operation team had to perform the entire manual process: determine which service needed rebuilding, run docker build command on local machine or directly on server, push image to Docker Hub, then SSH into server to run kubectl set image and kubectl rollout restart commands for each corresponding deployment. This process required the performer to clearly understand the entire system structure, remember the exact deployment name of each service, and perform the steps in the correct order without automatic checking. With a system consisting of many microservices such as ContestantPortal, ContestantBE, DeploymentCenter and AdminMVC, each time only one service needed updating still required a lot of time to perform manually and had high potential for errors, especially in the final preparation stage before the competition when many changes occurred simultaneously. The lack of CI/CD process significantly increased operation risks caused the development team to spend a lot of effort on repetitive tasks and reduced the frequency of being able to release patches without causing downtime or affecting system stability.
3.7.4.12. Challenge Management Weaknesses
a, Limitations in View Challenges and Search Challenges screen (IS-27)
In the current system, the challenge list does not provide sufficient important information to serve administration and competition operation, such as difficulty, creator, tags, deploy status and state. When the number of challenges increases, viewing only the basic list makes it difficult for Admin and Challenge Writer to quickly evaluate the characteristics of each challenge, difficult to detect hidden challenges, challenges that have been deployed or challenges with many related tags. In addition, the challenge search and filter function does not support combining multiple criteria such as category, type, name field, keyword, tags, difficulty, state and prerequisite, leading to administrators having to filter manually or switch through many different screens. This increases operation time, reduces administration efficiency and easily causes errors when having to process many challenges in the same contest.
b, Limitations in challenge deployment configuration (IS-28)
In the old version, the challenge deployment configuration screen only supported basic information such as expose port and deploy file, did not allow adjustment of important parameters related to resources and safety level of the running environment. The system did not support configuring CPU request/limit, memory request/limit, or limiting the maximum number of deploys for each challenge. Therefore, Challenge Writers had difficulty controlling the resource usage level of the pod and difficulty preventing cases where contestants continuously created instances beyond actual needs. When the competition had many challenges running simultaneously, this lack increased the risk of resource overload, affecting the stability of the cluster and consistency in the deployment process.
c, Lack of support for dynamic challenges and gradual point reduction mechanism (IS-29)
The current system does not fully support dynamic challenge type, in which the challenge value changes according to the number of correct submissions. Because there are no specialized interface and logic for dynamic challenges, Challenge Writers cannot customize attributes such as current value, initial value, decay function, decay value and minimum value. This makes the system only suitable for static challenges, while challenges that need a point reduction mechanism over time or according to the number of solvers cannot be correctly represented. The lack of dynamic scoring reduces the flexibility of the platform, limits the ability to design high-competition exam questions and does not correctly reflect the requirements of modern CTF competitions.
d, Lack of challenge version management mechanism (IS-30)
When Challenge Writers edit challenges, changes to Dockerfile, flag, description content, resources or deployment configuration can be applied directly without being saved as separate versions. This leads to the system not having version history to compare when it is necessary to check changes or find the cause of incidents arising after updates. If a new edit causes the challenge to have build or deploy errors, Challenge Writers cannot quickly review the previous stable version to compare configurations. The lack of version history mechanism reduces change tracing capability, causes difficulty in challenge maintenance process and increases the risk of interruption while the competition is running.
e, Lack of safe challenge version rollback process (IS-31)
Even when Challenge Writers realize that a new challenge version is causing errors, the old system still does not provide a clear and consistent rollback flow to quickly restore to stable status. Restoration usually must be performed manually by editing configuration files again, updating image tags or redeploying the challenge, so it is highly susceptible to errors and time-consuming under running contest conditions. In addition, because there is no rollback confirmation mechanism and synchronous redeployment, operators may accidentally return to a configuration that is not compatible with current data. This reduces the reliability of the system and makes challenge incidents handling slow and riskier than necessary.
f, Lack of Shared Instance challenge type support (IS-32)
The current system only supports a per-team instance model and lacks a mechanism for shared environmental challenges. This forces organizers to handle such cases manually or leads to resource waste. Therefore, a “Shared Instance” model should be introduced to support these scenarios.
3.7.4.13. Dependency on Docker Hub for service and challenge image registry (IS-33)
The current CI/CD build and deployment flow still relies on Docker Hub as the main registry for not only challenge images but also all core system service images (such as Contestant Portal, Admin MVC, Deployment Center, Gateway, etc.). This creates two practical limitations. First, Docker Hub's free private repository quota is limited to 20 GB, which is not sufficient for long-term operation when the system stores many challenge images, system service builds, versioned artifacts, and backups. Second, depending on a third-party public registry for core infrastructure components adds an external supply-chain dependency to a platform that needs strict control over image storage, access, and auditability. Any registry outage, rate limit, or credential exposure can delay both challenge deployment and system updates, weakening the overall security posture and stability of the competition platform. For these reasons, the image registry layer for the entire platform needs to be moved to a self-hosted solution.
3.8. Potential solutions
3.8.1. Application Logic & Data Integrity Issues
3.8.1.1. Improving the Health Check mechanism during challenge deployment
The health check mechanism during challenge deployment aims to ensure that the status reported by the system to contestants accurately reflects the actual accessibility of the service. In the current system, the Argo workflow ending successfully only ensures that the infrastructure-level deployment steps have been completed but does not confirm that the application inside the container is ready to serve requests. This leads to the system returning the connection string while the service is still starting, causing confusion and negatively affecting user experience.
To overcome this issue, the solution includes two complementary components:
a, Adding Readiness Probe to Pod Manifest (SOL-2.1)
Kubernetes provides a readiness probe mechanism that allows checking the readiness status of the application before marking the pod as Ready. There are two main implementation methods considered for the F-CTF system.
●	HTTP Endpoint Check: The application provides a health check endpoint (for example /health or /ready) for Kubernetes to send HTTP requests and confirm the application is ready when it receives a successful response. This is the method with the highest accuracy because the application itself determines the time it is ready to serve requests. However, this solution requires all Challenge Writers to add a health check endpoint in the application, which can significantly increase complexity and development burden in a CTF environment with many different authors.
●	TCP Socket Check: Kubernetes only checks the ability to establish a TCP connection to the service port. This method does not require any changes from Challenge Writers in the application; therefore, it is more suitable for the F-CTF context. Although this approach does not fully reflect the internal status of the application, it still helps ensure that the service is at a minimum level accessible from the contestant's side, eliminating basic connection errors such as CONNECTION_REFUSED.
b, Updating Pod Watcher Logic (SOL-2.2)
In addition to adding readiness probe, the watcher code needs to be adjusted to correctly check pod-level status instead of only relying on container status. Specifically, instead of only checking "ContainerStatuses[].Ready", the watcher needs to check the pod-level condition "PodCondition Ready=True". Only when this condition is satisfied does the backend emit RUNNING status and return the connection string to the contestant.
Combining these two components ensures that the system complies correctly with the Kubernetes Pod Lifecycle contract: the pod is only considered ready when all containers are ready and readiness probes (if any) all succeed. This eliminates the confusion between "container running" and "application ready to serve".
The table below presents a detailed comparison between three health check mechanisms, including the case of not applying health check as in the current system.
Criteria	No Health Check	TCP Socket Check	HTTP Endpoint Check
Kubernetes configuration	No probe	readinessProbe: tcpSocket		readinessProbe: httpGet
Requirement for challenge writer	None	None	Must add /health endpoint
Time to return URL	Fastest (Immediately after workflow completes)	Slower (After port can receive TCP connection)	Slowest (When app returns 200 OK)
Eliminates CONNECTION_REFUSED	None	Yes	Yes
Eliminates 503/500/timeout	None	None	Yes
Accuracy	Low	Medium	High
Table 6: Comparison table of Health Check mechanisms for Challenge Deployment
Comparison between the system before and after applying the solution:
Aspect	Before	After
Dependency checking	Only based on container status	Based on readiness probe + PodCondition Ready
Time user receives connection	Early, causing connection errors	Only when service is truly ready
User experience	System looks unstable	Smooth, system reliable
Watcher accuracy	Easy to confuse status	Correct according to Kubernetes contract
Table 7: Comparison table of system before and after applying health check mechanism
Based on the above analysis, TCP socket check is evaluated as the most suitable solution for F-CTF in the current stage. This method provides significant improvement compared to having no health check, eliminates basic connection errors that contestants may encounter immediately after receiving the connection string, and does not require any changes from the question setter side.
Applying TCP socket check as the default health check mechanism, combined with updating pod watcher logic to check "PodCondition Ready", helps improve the correctness of the system without increasing burden for question setters, while enhancing the overall experience of contestants during competition participation. This solution ensures the system complies correctly with Kubernetes Pod Lifecycle and eliminates the asynchrony between status notification and actual service accessibility.
3.8.1.2. Address the issue of contestant behavior log recording depending on the client side (SOL-3)
To overcome the weakness when the logging mechanism depends on the client side, Action Log recording needs to be moved to the backend side. Instead of letting the frontend send a separate save-logs API, the backend should automatically record logs based on actual API requests that the system processes, such as opening challenges, downloading files or requesting open hints. This approach ensures that log data accurately reflects actions that have been processed by the system, while eliminating the possibility of users spoofing or manipulating log content.
In addition, the logging process needs to be placed in a try-catch block to ensure that errors arising during logging do not affect the main processing flow of the system. If logging fails (for example, database connection error or data write error), the system only needs to record the internal error and continue processing the user’s request. This helps maintain system stability, avoiding a small error in the logging mechanism interrupts the main business functions.
3.8.2. Solutions to improve Infrastructure & Configuration Weaknesses
3.8.2.1. Reducing security risks when exposing challenge ports directly through network ports (SOL-4)
To solve the above problem, the system proposes choosing an intermediate gateway model, in which all connections from players must go through a single control point. The gateway allows performing authentication, recording contestant action logs, limiting access, and dynamic routing to the correct challenge instance, while backends only exist in the internal network of the cluster.
 
Figure 25: ChallengeGateway Architecture Overview
ChallengeGateway is deployed as an intermediary service that handles both TCP and HTTP traffic. The gateway is the only entry point from the Internet, while challenge backends do not need to be exposed directly to the outside. When deployed on Kubernetes, the gateway can be exposed via NodePort or LoadBalancer, while challenge pods are only accessed from within the cluster.
For TCP connections, the gateway receives connections from players, applies basic access limitation mechanisms and requires providing an authentication token. After the token is verified as valid, the gateway opens an internal TCP connection to the corresponding backend and forwards two-way data at pure byte-stream level. During this process, the gateway does not analyze or edit data content, ensuring pwn challenges operate correctly when connecting directly.
For web-type challenges, the gateway operates as a reverse proxy, authenticates the token and routes HTTP requests to the corresponding backend. The token can be managed through URL or cookie to ensure user experience and reduce the risk of leaking access information.
The gateway uses a self-signed token-based authentication mechanism to map players to the correct challenge backend within a limited time. Authentication is performed directly at the gateway without depending on the database during connection processing, helping to reduce latency and simplify architecture.
Besides authentication, the gateway applies multiple access limitation layers to minimize resource abuse, including limitation by IP address before authentication and limitation by token after authentication. When it is necessary to expand the system with many gateway replicas, limitation status can be shared through Redis to ensure consistency across the entire system.
Compared to commercial TCP proxy services on cloud platforms, ChallengeGateway does not provide advanced features such as completely hiding backend IP or large-scale anti-DDoS. However, not using these solutions is a practical decision due to cost limitations and flexible expansion requirements according to the large number of challenges and instances in the CTF environment.
The main advantage of ChallengeGateway is the ability to centrally control access for both TCP and HTTP, preventing unauthorized access and cross-access between challenges, while completely preserving byte-stream for pwn challenges. The minimalist design helps the gateway to be easy to deploy, easy to expand and suitable for actual operation conditions of a CTF platform.
However, the gateway does not aim to completely hide the network infrastructure and does not replace low-level security mechanisms such as anti-DDoS or firewall. In addition, because there is an authentication phase before starting to proxy TCP data, the gateway is not suitable for scenarios requiring data transmission right from the first byte without any handshake.
Solution	Main features	Advantage	Limit	Overall assessment
Cloud-based TCP Proxy (e.g. Cloudflare Spectrum)	TCP proxy, hide backend IP, filter access, anti-DDoS	High protection level, stable infrastructure, reduced network attack risk	High cost, charged by port/traffic, difficult to expand with many challenges	Good technique but not feasible in cost for large-scale CTF
ChallengeGateway	TCP/HTTP gateway, token authentication, dynamic routing, byte-stream proxy	Centralized access control, complete byte-stream preservation, low cost, flexible for CTF	Does not completely hide IP, no large anti-DDoS, has TCP authentication phase	Balanced solution, most suitable for multi-user CTF
Table 8: Comparison of Gateway-Based Solutions for Secure Challenge Exposure in CTF Platforms
ChallengeGateway solves a core problem in the CTF system which is controlling access and dynamic routing to the correct challenge instance for each player, especially for pwn challenges using pure TCP. By focusing on the intermediate gateway model, token authentication and byte-stream proxy, the system achieves a balance between security, performance, and feasibility in operation. Although not a comprehensive security solution, ChallengeGateway provides a suitable and practical platform to ensure fairness and control in the Capture The Flag competition environment.
3.8.2.2. Improving the isolation and privilege mechanism of challenges (SOL-5)
To overcome the Pod Security Standards violations stated, the challenge deployment template is redesigned to achieve compliance with Restricted policy level - the highest security level recommended for untrusted workloads. Improvements are implemented according to a defense-in-depth strategy, in which each independent protection layer has the ability to limit the impact scope (blast radius) of the challenge in case of exploitation, ensuring no impact on important components of the F-CTF system.
First, the new template proposes using sandbox runtime to add a safe isolation layer between the challenge container and the real kernel of the node host. Putting the challenge into a sandbox environment helps significantly reduce the risk of container escape and limit the impact of kernel-level vulnerabilities.
In terms of architecture, sandbox runtime differs from the default container runtime (runc). With runc, all containers on the same node share the host kernel directly according to the shared kernel model. When the application in the container performs a system call, this call is transmitted directly down to the real kernel of the host. This creates a large attack surface: if there is a vulnerability in the host kernel, the attacker only needs to exploit once to escape the container and take control of the entire node.
Sandbox runtime solves this problem with a higher-level isolation architecture, usually dual-kernel or syscall interception, in which each sandboxed container is provided with a separate processing environment. The core of this mechanism is the ability to intercept and handle all system calls from the container. When the application inside the challenge performs a syscall, instead of transmitting directly down to the host kernel, the runtime will handle and emulate the syscall in its own isolated environment or safely redirect the request. Only a very small set of safe and necessary syscalls are forwarded down to the real host kernel.
In addition, this mechanism also ensures tight management of all filesystem I/O operations, ensuring the container has no ability to directly access the host filesystem but must go through a controlled intermediate layer.
This mechanism significantly reduces the attack surface at the kernel level. In the runc model, the attacker only needs to exploit one vulnerability in the host kernel to perform container escape. With sandbox runtime, the attacker must overcome the sandbox protection layer before being able to access the host kernel - a much more complex requirement. The sandbox environment itself is also enhanced with seccomp-bpf, namespaces and cgroups mechanisms, while completely prohibiting dangerous syscalls.
The table below compares in detail between runc and sandbox runtime in terms of isolation aspects:
Feature	runc (Default Runtime)	Sandboxed Runtime
Isolation Layer	Based on host Linux kernel	Separate kernel layer (User-space kernel/VM) between container and host
Kernel Sharing	Containers share host kernel directly	Each container has its own kernel environment or emulation
System Calls	Syscalls transmitted directly down to host kernel	Syscalls are intercepted and handled by sandbox; only safe syscalls are forwarded
Security Boundary	Host Linux kernel; vulnerability can lead to host compromise	Sandbox boundary; need to exploit both sandbox layer and host kernel
Attack Surface	Large - container interacts directly with complex kernel	Significantly reduced due to intercepting and emulating syscalls
Table 9: Comparison of Container Runtime - runc vs Sandboxed Runtime
Although sandboxed runtime has performance overhead due to syscall interception and emulation mechanism, this is a completely acceptable trade-off in the CTF system context. Challenges have short lifecycles (from a few minutes to a few hours), low resource requirements, and workloads are mainly I/O bound rather than CPU intensive. More importantly, in a CTF environment where challenges are intentionally designed to contain vulnerabilities for contestants to exploit, tight isolation at the kernel level becomes a mandatory requirement to protect the system’s infrastructure.
Along with that, the new template strictly enforces the principle of least privilege. Challenges are forced to run under non-root user with clearly specified UID, while eliminating the possibility of privilege escalation. The root filesystem is set to read-only mode, ensuring the process inside the container cannot change system files or install persistence mechanisms. Removing all Linux capabilities continues to narrow the set of rights the challenge can use.
To reduce the attack surface at the kernel level, the new template applies Kubernetes’ default seccomp profile to limit the set of syscalls allowed to be called. This mechanism helps eliminate unnecessary syscalls for the challenge logic, thereby reducing the ability to exploit potential kernel vulnerabilities without affecting the normal function of the challenge.
In addition, the new template also applies AppArmor profile in RuntimeDefault mode, adding a mandatory access control mechanism at kernel level to limit file access capability and process interactions. The system also strictly limits the types of volumes allowed to be mounted into the pod, only allowing safe types such as ConfigMap, Secret, EmptyDir and PersistentVolumeClaim, while completely prohibiting HostPath volumes to prevent direct access to the node host filesystem.
In addition, security policies at the namespace level are also applied to control the behavior and communication scope of challenges. Pod Security Standards at restricted level are enforced to ensure every pod in the namespace complies with strict security constraints. NetworkPolicy is configured according to the default deny-all model, only allowing the minimum necessary communication flows, thereby preventing the challenge from illegally accessing the database and internal services of the system.
The table below presents an overall comparison between the old template and the new template, to clarify the main improvements in isolation level, privileges and behavior control of challenges in the F-CTF system.
Aspect	Old Template	New Template	Impact on system
Runtime isolation	No sandbox layer	Container runs in Sandbox environment	Reduces container escape risk
Pod Security Standards at namespace level	Not applied	Enforce restricted level	Prevents pods from violating policy
Syscall filtering	Not applied	Applies default profile	Narrows syscall surface, reduces kernel attacks
User rights	Non-root not mandatory	Mandatory non-root run	Reduces process privileges
Filesystem	Allows writing	Read-only	Prevents persistence, backdoor
Temporary storage	None	Temporary memory area in RAM	Data self-deletes when ending
Service type	Expose directly to cluster node (NodePort)	Only within cluster	Reduces attack surface
Default network policy	None	Block all	Completely isolates challenge
Ingress control	No limit	Only allow from gateway	Controls access source
Egress control	No limit	Only allow DNS	Prevents external communication
Linux capabilities	Drop all (Previously implemented)	Drop all	Remains the same
Privilege escalation	Already prohibited	Already prohibited	Remains the same
Pod-level Security Context	None	Has pod-level securityContext	Enforces security defaults for all containers
Pod Security Admission	Not enforced	Enforce restricted level	Automatically rejects pods violating policy
AppArmor Profile	Not configured	RuntimeDefault	Adds mandatory access control
Volume Types	No limit	Only allow safe volumes	Prevents hostPath access
Table 10: Comparison and evaluation table of challenge template
Improving the challenge deployment template helps the F-CTF system enhance the ability to protect internal components, especially the database and platform services, against impacts arising from the challenge operation process. Through adding a runtime isolation layer, tightly controlling process privileges and applying clear network policies, challenges are strictly limited within the scope of the challenge’s function.
This approach ensures that challenges only can access necessary resources, while minimizing the risk of affecting the integrity, security and stability of the entire F-CTF system during operation.
3.8.2.3. Load control and workflow stability by resource allocation and priority mechanism
a. Solutions
To completely overcome the issues analyzed in section 3.7.2.3, the F-CTF system has implemented four main solutions to ensure self-recovery capability and stable operation under high load conditions.
Solution 1: Isolate Control Plane by Node Taints (SOL-6.1)
Problem solved: Prevent application workloads from competing for resources with control plane components, avoiding control plane degradation when the system is under high load.
Solution principle: Apply taint mechanism to K3s server node to prevent regular workloads from being scheduled to this node. Only system components with suitable toleration are allowed to run on the master node. This ensures CPU and Memory resources are always available for core components such as etcd, API server, scheduler, and controller-manager.
Reason necessary in K3s environment: Because K3s does not support system-reserved or kube-reserved configurations like standard Kubernetes, applying taint to the control-plane node becomes the only and mandatory measure to protect core components from resource shortage. This is an important best practice in production environments when using K3s.
Expected effectiveness: When application workloads cannot be scheduled to the master node, control plane components will not compete for resources. This ensures the scheduler has enough CPU to handle pod placement decisions, controller-manager can perform reconciliation loops on time, and API server always responds quickly. The system avoids cascading failures when the cluster is under high load.
Solution 2: Control Workflow lifecycle with Resource Requests and Timeout (SOL-6.2)
Problem solved: Prevent workflows from running indefinitely and ensure the scheduler has accurate information about resource needs to make appropriate scheduling decisions.
Solution principle: This solution includes two complementary parts. First, clearly declare resource requests and limits for workflow pods, helping the scheduler know exactly the number of resources needed and only schedule the pod when the node has enough available resources. Second, establish timeout mechanism through activeDeadlineSeconds so that the workflow automatically terminates after a determined period if it is not complete.
Mechanism of Resource Requests: When the workflow pod declares resource requests, the scheduler will only schedule the pod to the node when that node has enough unreserved resources. This creates a natural backpressure mechanism - workflows will be in pending status instead of being accepted and then running indefinitely under resource shortage conditions. The scheduler could reject workflows when the cluster is overloaded, preventing serious over-commit.
Mechanism of Timeout: Timeout mechanism ensures workflows cannot run indefinitely when encountering abnormal situations such as challenge pods not being schedulable. After the timeout period, the workflow automatically terminates and releases resources, reducing pressure on the Argo controller and database. This is an important fail-fast mechanism helping the system self-recover.
Expected effectiveness: With resource requests, the scheduler can make accurate decisions and workflows do not accumulate indefinitely in running status. With timeout, deadlock workflows will automatically terminate and release resources. The system avoids resource exhaustion spiral and significantly reduces the number of workflows that need to be tracked by the Argo controller.
Solution 3: Establish Priority & Preemption Policy (SOL-6.3)
Problem solved: Ensure important tasks such as cleanup jobs and system services always have the ability to reclaim resources from lower-priority workloads, avoiding deadlock when the cluster runs out of resources.
Solution principle: Establish a priority hierarchy (PriorityClass hierarchy) for different types of workloads in the cluster. Cleanup jobs and system services are assigned the highest priority level, Argo workflow pods have medium priority, and challenge pods have the lowest priority. When the cluster is full of resources and there is a high-priority pod that needs to be scheduled, the scheduler is authorized to evict lower-priority pods.
Preemption Mechanism: When a cleanup job needs to be scheduled but all nodes have reserved full capacity, the scheduler will search for lower-priority pods currently running on the cluster. The scheduler then evicts challenge pods (with the lowest priority) to release resources, then schedules the cleanup job into the newly released resources. After being scheduled, the cleanup job will execute the task of cleaning up expired challenge pods, continuing to release more resources for the system.
Breaking Deadlock: The priority and preemption mechanism breaks the important resource deadlock loop: previously, challenge pods occupied resources and cleanup pods could not run to clean them up. With preemption policy, cleanup jobs have the right to reclaim resources from challenge pods, ensuring the cleanup process can always occur even when the cluster is full.
Expected effectiveness: The system could automatically clean up resources without manual intervention. Important tasks such as cleanup jobs and system services are not affected by the resource exhaustion status of the cluster. The system avoids deadlock state and maintains continuous self-recovery capability.
Solution 4: Implementing Request Queue between DeploymentCenter and Argo Workflows (SOL-6.4)
Problem solved: Control the speed of submitting workflows to Argo to avoid overloading etcd and Argo controller, ensure timeout mechanisms operate accurately according to design and the system has self-recovery capability.
Problem context: In the initial stress test, although workflow timeout was configured for two minutes, workflows took up to twenty minutes to timeout. The cause was when one thousand workflows were submitted at the same time, etcd and Argo controller were seriously overloaded. Argo timeout is not a real-time timer but is enforced through the controller reconciliation loop - when the controller is congested, workflows that have expired must wait until the controller is free to be processed.
Solution: Build a message queue (RabbitMQ) placed between DeploymentCenter API and Argo Workflows, acting as a buffer and concurrency regulator. Instead of accepting all requests and submitting directly to Argo, the system puts requests into the queue and uses workers to process with tightly controlled concurrency.
Concurrency Control Mechanism:
Worker implements hybrid control strategy including two protection layers:
●	Primary: Concurrency-based control
a.	Worker queries the number of Running workflows in Argo before each submission
b.	Only submits when current_running < 30
c.	Ensures Argo is never overloaded, workqueue always at stable level
●	Secondary: Rate limiting protection
a.	Worker does not submit more than 10 workflows/second even if there are empty slots
b.	Prevents etcd write spike if many workflows complete simultaneously
●	Circuit breaker protection:
a.	If Argo query fails 3 consecutive times, worker pauses submissions for 60 seconds
b.	Allows Argo controller recovery after batch cleanup events
c.	Explanation of 20-minute downtime observed in Test 2
Comparison before and after: Before having the queue, one thousand workflow CRDs created simultaneously caused etcd write spike, informer lag, and controller backlog, leading to timeout being processed late by tens of minutes. After having the queue with rate limiting, workflows were submitted at controlled speed, etcd write stable, controller reconciled on time, and timeout mechanisms operated accurately according to configuration.
Additional benefits: Besides ensuring timeout operates accurately, the queue also brings better observability - queue depth, processing rate can be observed, and throughput adjusted according to real-time metrics. The system also has graceful degradation capability - handling burst traffic without paralyzing the control plane. The queue can also implement retry logic with exponential backoff when Argo returns resource quota exceeded error.
Expected effectiveness: Argo controller and etcd operate within design limits, not overloaded. Timeout mechanisms such as activeDeadlineSeconds and podGC are enforced at the configured time. The system could handle burst traffic in a stable way without affecting the accuracy of workflow lifecycle management mechanisms.
b. Summary of solutions
The proposed solutions do not aim to increase the total resources of the cluster, but focus on using resources in a controlled way and following Kubernetes best practices under real K3s conditions.
Control plane isolation helps eliminate the risk of the cluster hanging due to lack of resources for core components. Resource and timeout control for workflows helps prevent workflows from hanging indefinitely and reduces accumulated pressure on the system. Priority and preemption mechanism ensures that life-critical tasks, especially resource cleanup, always could be executed, thereby avoiding resource deadlock loops. Request queue ensures controller-based mechanisms operate correctly according to design by preventing overload from the beginning.
Although these solutions increase complexity in system configuration and operation, they are evaluated as necessary and suitable for the scale and characteristics of F-CTF. When implemented synchronously, these measures help the system change from “permanently hanging when overloaded” status to “automatic self-recovery” status, meeting production operation requirements for the F-CTF platform.
3.8.2.4. Proposed for Configuration Security & Hardening (SOL-7)
To overcome configuration vulnerabilities and violations of security standards that have been detected by Kubescape and Trivy, a comprehensive “Hardening” strategy needs to be applied to Kubernetes Manifests.
Enforce Security Context (Pod Hardening):
●	Set "runAsNonRoot: true" and "runAsUser: <UID>" (for example: UID 1000) for all containers to prevent running under root privileges.
●	Enable "readOnlyRootFilesystem: true" to prevent overwriting system files.
●	Configure "capabilities.drop: ["ALL"]" to remove all unnecessary Linux privileges.
Deploy Network Policies (using Calico or Cilium) to apply Zero-trust model:
●	Default Deny-All: Block all traffic between pods by default.
●	Allow-list: Only allow traffic through specific ports between authenticated microservices (for example: "admin-mvc" is only allowed to call "database" through port 5432).
●	Egress Control: Block connections to the Internet from unnecessary pods to prevent malware download or data exfiltration.
Automated Policy Enforcement: Use Kyverno or OPA Gatekeeper as Admission Controller in the cluster. Configure these policies to automatically reject Pod creation requests if they violate security rules (for example: no resource limit, running as root, mounting host path), ensuring the cluster always complies with NSA/CISA standards right from the input.
3.8.3. Refactoring Code to Eliminate Anti-patterns
3.8.3.1. Overcoming N+1 query error (SOL-8)
For the N+1 Query Problem, the core solution is to eliminate performing database queries inside the loop processing each Challenge. Instead, the system performs a pre-query for all related data (for example solve status of team or user) with a fixed number of queries, then stores the results in in-memory data structures such as HashSet or Dictionary for quick lookup. This approach helps reduce the number of queries from the 1 + N model down to only 1-2 queries, significantly improving performance and reducing API latency. In addition, using projection, JOIN or subquery directly in SQL queries can also be applied so that the database processes data relationships in a more optimal way.
3.8.3.2. Fixing DI Lifetime and DbContext management error (SOL-9)
For the DI Lifetime Scope issue, the system needs to be adjusted in the way services are registered and used that consume heavy resources. Services communicating with the Kubernetes API are changed to a reuse connection or controlled singleton model, avoiding creating many new instances and many unnecessary parallel connections. At the same time, business classes such as ScoreHelper are refactored to directly inject DbContext through Dependency Injection, allowing the DI container to manage the context lifecycle according to the request. This method helps reduce the number of database connections created, limits pressure on the connection pool and eliminates the popular anti-pattern in Entity Framework for high-load systems such as CTF.
3.8.3.3. Optimizing Redis access (SOL-10)
For Redis KEYS Command Blocking, the system needs to completely replace the use of the KEYS command with a non-blocking keyspace scanning mechanism based on SCAN with pagination. Cache data is processed in batches with limited size, avoiding loading all keys and values into memory at once. In addition, the system adds batch GET methods to retrieve multiple cache values in only one round trip, reducing the number of requests to Redis and increasing load capacity when the dataset is large or concurrent access is high.
3.8.3.4. Implementing CSRF protection mechanism (SOL-11)
First, the system needs to add a CSRF token mechanism for all forms using the POST method. Each user session is assigned a unique token generated by the server and embedded in the form as a hidden field. The server will authenticate the token when receiving the request and reject invalid requests with HTTP 403 error code, ensuring only valid requests from the system interface are processed.
In addition, endpoints using the CSRF bypass mechanism need to be reviewed and removed to reduce the attack surface and ensure consistency in security policy. The system also needs to configure the SameSite=Strict attribute for session cookies to prevent the browser from sending cookies in requests from external domains, thereby minimizing the risk of CSRF exploitation. At the same time, legacy APIs that are no longer used need to be removed or access limited through session control mechanism and endpoint whitelist to enhance access control and system protection.
3.8.3.5. Event-Driven Monitoring and Code Quality Standardization (SOL-12)
To overcome the inefficiency of periodic polling, a feasible method is to switch to an event-driven watching model by using the Kubernetes Informer/Watcher API - a mechanism that allows the service to register to listen to Pod status change events directly from Kubernetes instead of proactively sending requests at fixed intervals. This approach helps the system only consume resources when real events occur, significantly reducing the number of unnecessary requests to the API Server, while shortening status detection latency compared to polling which is limited by the fixed cycle.
To overcome code quality issues, a feasible method is to strictly apply SOLID principles and standardize naming convention according to a unified agreement throughout the project. Specifically, separating responsibilities between classes through the Single Responsibility Principle helps each service only handle one group of business, making it easier to test and maintain. In addition, adding a centralized GlobalExceptionFilter helps unify error handling and return across the entire system, avoiding the situation where each controller handles errors in its own way which easily leads to leaking internal information. Compared to the old design, this approach makes the codebase easier to read, easier for new members to onboard, and minimizes the risk of potential bugs arising due to duplicated or scattered logic.
3.8.3.6. Enforcing contest-state and prerequisite checks in file download flow (SOL-13)
To address IS-12.1, the file download endpoint needs a strict business authorization gate before any file read operation is executed. The system must reject requests when the contest has not started, has ended, or is in a non-access state by policy.
For challenge files, the endpoint must also block access if challenge visibility is hidden for contestants or if prerequisite challenges have not been completed by the requesting team. If prerequisite metadata is malformed, missing, or fails validation, the endpoint must apply fail-closed behavior (deny-by-default) instead of continuing the request.
With this approach, file delivery becomes bound to the real competition context, eliminating logic bypass cases where valid token alone could still lead to invalid file access.
3.8.3.7. Implementing multi-layer path control in the file download function (SOL-13.2)
To overcome the path manipulation vulnerability in the challenge file download function, the system can implement three independent control layers for the file download request processing method, in which each layer acts as a separate defense barrier, ensuring that even if one layer is bypassed, the remaining layers still maintain the safety of the system.
The first layer is path prefix checking: immediately after token authentication, the system checks whether the path parameter starts with the string "file/" or not (case-insensitive comparison). Any path that does not satisfy this condition is immediately rejected, thereby limiting the entire access scope to only the specified subdirectory inside the NFS mount, excluding all paths pointing to other storage areas that may contain more sensitive data.
The second layer is database-based path authentication or database whitelist: the token is expanded to carry additional file_id, and the database query is designed to require both conditions f.Location == path and f.Id == fileToken.file_id to be satisfied simultaneously. This mechanism has core security meaning: only paths that have been pre-registered in the Files table and match the file for which the token was issued can be allowed access; any arbitrary path created by the contestant themselves cannot pass this step even if syntactically valid.
The third layer is business-based access control: for files belonging to challenge type, the system performs two additional logical checks. First, reject if the corresponding challenge is in hidden status. Next, verify whether the contestant’s team has completed enough prerequisite challenges or not based on the team’s solved list in the database. If the challenge’s requirements JSON string has syntax error, the system defaults to deny-safe, avoiding error analysis leading to granting unintended rights. Overall these three control layers ensure that contestants can only download the exact file for which their token was issued, in the correct competition context and only when business conditions have been fully satisfied.
The fourth layer is infrastructure isolation at Kubernetes volume level: the deployment configuration of the contestant-be service is adjusted to no longer mount the entire root NFS directory into the container, instead only mounting the exact subdirectory that the application is allowed to access via subPath: file (corresponding to mountPath: /mnt/nfs/data/file), while setting the volume in readOnly: true mode. This protection layer operates completely independently of application source code and is at the kernel/OS layer: even if the application is exploited or misconfigured, the process inside the container physically cannot see any content outside the file/ directory of NFS and also cannot overwrite any file on NFS. This is the most important defense-in-depth protection layer because it eliminates the attack surface at the infrastructure layer instead of only relying on checks in code. Overall, these four control layers ensure that contestants can only download the exact file for which their token was issued, in the correct competition context, only when business conditions have been fully satisfied, and even in the scenario where the application is compromised, the container cannot go beyond the physical limits established by the infrastructure.
3.8.3.8. Overcoming race condition in challenge lifecycle by distributed locks, status control and parallel processing (SOL-14)
To overcome the above issues, changes in the system not only focus on fixing errors in individual endpoints but also adjust the way the system processes the entire lifecycle of challenges. Improvements focus on three main directions: increasing safety level for important operations, tighter control of deployment lifecycle, and improving concurrent processing capability of infrastructure status monitoring components.
For the unlock hint function, a feasible solution is to expand the scope of the existing Redis lock to cover both the prerequisite condition checking step and hint status before writing data. When a request starts processing the unlock operation, the system can hold the lock corresponding to the user or team throughout the process of checking and updating data. Other requests must wait until the lock is released. This approach helps ensure that prerequisite checks, hint status and player points are performed on the latest data, avoiding situations where multiple requests pass the check step and write data almost simultaneously.
For dynamic challenges, recalculating the point value can be protected by a distributed lock according to challengeId. Before reading the number of teams that have solved the challenge and updating the point value again, the system can temporarily hold the lock corresponding to that challenge. This helps ensure that at any one time only one process performs the point calculation, thereby avoiding cases where multiple requests read old data and then overwrite each other’s results.
In the challenge stopping flow, another solution is to apply a distributed lock according to the team-challenge pair to ensure each deployment has only one stop process performed at a time. Before sending the stop request to Deployment Center, the backend can check again the existence of the deployment cache in Redis to confirm the challenge is active. This mechanism helps limit duplicate stop operations or late requests continuing to affect the already-stopped deployment. In addition, instead of updating STOPPED status with short existence time when receiving Deleted event from Kubernetes, another approach is to completely delete the deployment cache entry in Redis. This method helps avoid the listener overwriting previous statuses and reduces the possibility of deviation between cache status and the actual status of resources on Kubernetes.
In general, the solutions proposed above help significantly reduce the possibility of race condition occurring in important operations of the system. Sensitive operations are protected by distributed locking mechanisms, deployment status is controlled more tightly through clear intermediate steps, and events from Kubernetes are processed in a parallel model but still ensure the necessary order. Thereby the system can achieve better data consistency, higher concurrent processing capability and ensure fairness in the competition process.
3.8.3.9. Upgrading DeploymentListener according to sharding + multi-worker model (SOL-15)
For the DeploymentListener component, an improvement direction is to process more efficiently when many Kubernetes events occur at the same time by classifying events according to each Pod UID and allocating them to multiple parallel processing workers. Events related to the same pod are sent to the same worker to ensure processing order within each shard, while other workers can process other pods simultaneously. This design helps reduce event backlog when infrastructure load increases, shortens latency in synchronizing RUNNING, STOPPED or DELETING status to Redis and database, while still preserving the sequentiality necessary for each pod.
3.8.4. Operational Efficiency & UX
3.8.4.1. Improving user experience on Monitoring page and Pod Log
a, Improving Monitoring and Pod Log filter set (SOL-16.1)
To solve the limitation in observability on Monitoring and log page, the system needs to add flexible filters and quick operations for active challenge instances. Expanding displayed data helps Admin and Jury recognize status, challenge type and related subjects faster when the system has many simultaneous instances.
This solution aims to reduce dependence on manual operations, while shortening search and incident handling time during competition operation.
b, Adding auto-refresh for Pod Log (SOL-16.2)
For the pod log viewing page, the system needs to implement a real-time update mechanism or at least a quick refresh function without having to reload the entire page. When logs are continuously synchronized, Admin and Jury can monitor the progress of the pod during deployment or debugging without interruption.
Supporting auto-refresh log helps enhance continuous event monitoring capability and improves operation experience in contests with many challenge instances running simultaneously.
c, Building mechanism to track request logs from challenge instance (SOL-16.3)
To solve the limitation when the system does not provide logs of requests that contestants send to challenge instances, the backend needs to be expanded to record important requests right at the business processing layer instead of depending on the client. This approach helps logs accurately reflect real user behavior and reduces the risk of spoofing or missing data.
Besides storing logs per request, the system needs to add a request log lookup interface for Admin and Jury with filters by team, user, challenge, request status and time period. When request logs are stored centrally and can be queried quickly, organizers will easily detect abnormal behavior, support incident investigation and increase transparency in the competition operation process.
3.8.4.2. Upgrading analysis capability on Dashboard (SOL-17)
The current Dashboard mainly provides overview information, does not support in-depth analysis metrics to serve challenge quality evaluation and player behavior. To solve this limitation, the system needs to add analysis metrics such as solve rate of each challenge, average solve time, number of incorrect submissions, number of hint usages and point distribution over time. In addition, the dashboard should also provide statistics on the most solved challenges, the least solved and number of solves by category. Adding these metrics helps the Dashboard become an effective data analysis tool, supporting organizers in evaluating exam difficulty and making appropriate adjustments for future competitions.
3.8.4.3. Building Reward Query function to serve awards (SOL-18)
To overcome the problem of having to perform manual operations to query data to determine award categories, the system needs to build a Reward Query module allowing Admin to query and aggregate data according to multiple criteria such as Top N teams, minimum points, first blood, category or time period. At the same time, the system should support exporting data to Excel or CSV. This function helps speed up result aggregation, reduce errors due to manual operations and ensure transparency when announcing awards.
3.8.4.4. Enhancing User and Team management capability (SOL-19)
To improve user and team management capability, the system needs to expand information in the User table by adding fields such as team name, role, verified status, hidden, or banned, and support corresponding filters. For Team, the system needs to display additional information about captain, number of members and allow filtering by status or country. These improvements help Admin easily track and manage participant data, especially in large-scale competitions.
3.8.4.5. Completing Submission management function (SOL-20)
The current Submission management function still lacks necessary data filtering tools and has some errors in the data export process. To solve this problem, the system needs to add filters by team, user and time in the Submission screen. At the same time, the export error needs to be fixed to ensure data is exported accurately according to correct or incorrect status. In addition, the system should also support the score reset function for dynamic challenges and allow Admin to adjust submission status in special cases. These improvements help the submission processing process become more flexible and ensure accuracy when operating competitions.
3.8.4.6. Building Instance History and long-term log storage mechanism (SOL-21)
Currently the system does not have a mechanism allowing review of the entire lifecycle history of challenge instances, causing difficulty when needing to trace or report after the competition. To solve this problem, the system needs to build an Instance History module for Admin. This module stores essential information such as creation time, instance stop time, corresponding user and team. Data is stored persistently in the database and supports search, filtering by multiple criteria as well as exporting data to CSV file. Adding this function helps increase event tracing capability, supports reporting and post-competition analysis.
3.8.4.7. Implementing system-wide Audit Log mechanism (SOL-22)
The current system does not have a mechanism to fully record administration operations, making tracing difficult when incidents or disputes occur. To solve this problem, an Audit Log mechanism needs to be implemented to record important actions of Admin, Jury and Challenge Writer such as editing challenges, changing configuration, handling submissions or updating user and team information. Log data needs to be designed in read-only mode to ensure it cannot be edited or deleted. This mechanism helps increase tracing capability, supports internal checking and ensures transparency in the CTF system operation process.
3.8.4.8. Implementing mechanism to view Action Log for administrators (SOL-23)
Besides recording logs, the system also needs to provide an intuitive interface so that administrators can look up and analyze activities that have occurred. To meet this need, an Action Log screen needs to be built in the Admin Interface allowing filtering by contest, user, team, action type, challenge and time period. The system also needs to support search, pagination and data export for reporting. In addition, the permission mechanism needs to be designed clearly to ensure each role can only access the appropriate log scope. This function helps enhance system monitoring capability, support cheating tracing and increase transparency in the competition organization process.
3.8.4.9. Improving Import/Export function (SOL-24)
The current import/export function still has some errors and does not provide detailed feedback information after processing batch data. To overcome this problem, the system needs to complete the import/export mechanism to ensure data is processed stably with CSV files or configuration templates. At the same time, it needs to add import result reports, including number of successful records, failures and skipped cases (for example: username already exists). These improvements help Admin easily control the data entry process, reduce errors and increase reliability when operating with large numbers of records.
3.8.4.10. Improving bracket division function and scoreboard data display (SOL-25)
To overcome the current limitations of the bracket function, the system needs to add some improvements in both Contestant Portal and Admin Interface.
On the Contestant Portal, the Scoreboard page needs to support filtering by bracket, allowing contestants to choose to view the ranking table of the entire competition or only within the scope of their bracket. This feature helps contestants easily track their position in the corresponding classification group.
On Admin Interface, the system needs to complete the bracket management function, allowing administrators to assign users or teams to each bracket and view the member list in each group. At the same time, the Visibility configuration section needs to add options to allow or restrict displaying scoreboard between brackets.
These improvements help increase flexibility when organizing competitions with many groups of participants, while improving the ranking table tracking experience for contestants.
3.8.4.11. Building automated CI/CD process for system deployment (SOL-26)
To overcome the weakness of the manual deployment process, a feasible solution is for the system to be supplemented with an automated CI/CD pipeline based on GitHub Actions, triggered when changes are pushed to the main branch. The pipeline performs build and deployment of services to the cluster automatically, while only rebuilding services affected by source code changes to optimize processing time.
The deployment process is controlled through rollout status checking steps to ensure updates are applied successfully before completing the pipeline. In addition, concurrency management mechanism is also integrated to avoid multiple pipelines deploying to the production environment at the same time causing conflicts. Thanks to this mechanism, the deployment process that previously required many manual operations is simplified to one git push operation, helping to reduce human errors, ensure the production environment is always synchronized with the latest source code and allow faster release of updates or security patches.
3.8.4.12. Challenge Management Improvements
a, Upgrading View Challenges and Search Challenges (SOL-27)
To solve the limitation in observability and data retrieval of challenges, the system needs to be improved towards increasing transparency and information filtering capability. Expanding displayed information and supporting flexible filtering mechanisms helps users quickly grasp the status and characteristics of each challenge in the system.
This solution aims to reduce dependence on manual operations, while improving administration efficiency when the number of challenges increases. When search and classification capability is optimized, administrators can make decisions faster and minimize errors in the contest operation process.
b, Adding full deployment configuration for challenges (SOL-28)
An important weakness of the current system is the limited ability to control deployment configuration, especially related to resources and isolation level. Therefore, a tighter configuration management approach needs to be applied to ensure each challenge is deployed in a controlled environment.
Adding resource configuration parameters and validity checking mechanism before deployment helps minimize the risk of system overload and configuration errors. At the same time, enhancing this control capability also contributes to improving the stability of the entire infrastructure, especially in the context of many challenges being deployed simultaneously.
c, Full support for dynamic challenges (SOL-29)
To support challenges with point reduction mechanism according to the number of correct submissions, the system needs to add dynamic challenge type with separate configuration fields such as current value, initial value, decay function, decay value and minimum value. The administration interface needs to allow Challenge Writers to choose the appropriate point reduction function type, for example Linear or Logarithmic, and clearly display the current point value for easy tracking during the competition.
At the business processing layer, the backend needs to recalculate the challenge points based on the number of teams or players who have solved correctly and update this value consistently after each valid submission. This design helps the system correctly reflect the competitive behavior of the contest, increase flexibility for question setters and better suit modern CTF models.
d, Building challenge version management mechanism (SOL-30)
To solve the problem of challenge changes being overwritten directly, the system needs to save each challenge edit as a separate version. Each version should include information about creation time, Docker configuration, flag, resource settings and description content at that time. The Version History interface needs to support viewing the version list in chronological order, and also allow viewing details of each version to compare configurations.
Storing version history helps Challenge Writers and Admins easily trace changes, quickly detect which update caused build/deploy errors, and maintain challenge quality control over time. This is an important foundation to reduce risks when operating long-running contests.
e, Establishing safe challenge version rollback process (SOL-31)
In real operation environment, the ability to quickly restore to stable status is an important factor. Therefore, the system needs to support a controlled rollback mechanism, allowing return to previous versions in a consistent way.
This solution helps significantly reduce recovery time when challenges have built or deploy errors, while avoiding manual editing that is easy to cause errors. When rollback is attached to version history and automatic redeployment process, the system can return to stable status quickly and under control.
f, Adding Shared Instance challenge type (SOL-32)
To address this limitation, the system introduces a “Shared Instance” option for challenges. When enabled, a single shared environment is deployed and accessed by all teams. Changes are applied at both the data and backend layers to support this mode and ensure a consistent state across all teams. The solution remains fully backward compatible: existing challenges behave as before, while only those with “Shared Instance” enabled use the new model.
3.8.4.13. Transitioning service and challenge image registry (SOL-33)
To address the dependency on Docker Hub, the system should use Harbor as the unified self-hosted image registry for all F-CTF core services as well as challenge images. The CI/CD build pipeline will push all system component images (Contestant Portal, Admin MVC, Backend services, etc.) and challenge artifacts directly to Harbor, and deployment workflows will pull images exclusively from Harbor, keeping the full image supply chain under organizational control. Harbor provides project-level access control, TLS, audit logs, vulnerability scanning, and image retention policies, which makes it highly suitable for a competition platform that manages both sensitive challenge images and critical system services. Moving to Harbor removes the 20 GB free private-repository limit of Docker Hub, centralizes image management, and eliminates the operational risk of relying on an external third-party registry for production deployments and platform updates.
3.8.5. Solution Group for Architecture and Security (SOL-1)
Based on the analyzed vulnerabilities and risks, the remediation process will focus on re-establishing a secure architecture following the principles of least privilege and defense-in-depth across all system layers. The core objective is to isolate components, minimize the blast radius in the event of an incident, and eliminate redundant privileges that are unnecessary for business operations.
At the network layer, the system must immediately implement NetworkPolicies with a default-deny principle for both ingress and egress traffic. Instead of the current open network model, internal communication flows between pods will only be permitted when explicitly declared based on actual needs. Simultaneously, to counter the risk of data theft through internal packet sniffing, all communication traffic between services must be encrypted through the deployment of mTLS, ensuring the confidentiality of sensitive information such as tokens and challenge flags.
For the MariaDB database, restructuring authorization is an extremely urgent task. Administrators must immediately disable remote access capabilities for the superuser account, only allowing this account to connect from the local environment. The current shared account with full privileges must be removed and replaced with independent database accounts for each separate service. Each of these accounts will be strictly configured to limit access rights, only allowing query, insert, or update operations on the exact data tables that the service requires to process its business logic, absolutely preventing cross-data interference.
The security hardening process for Redis will begin by enabling the Access Control List (ACL) mechanism and completely disabling the uncontrolled default user. The system will create separate Redis users for each component, such as the admin interface, gateway, or deployment services. These accounts will be strictly limited to operating only on data key prefixes within their scope and will only be allowed to use a minimized command set. Specifically, destructive or system-monitoring commands such as configuration changes, full data flushes, server shutdowns, or traffic monitoring must be completely blocked or renamed to prevent the risk of abuse.
Regarding shared storage, the PersistentVolumes connected to NFS must be immediately updated with secure mount options (such as noexec) to prohibit the execution of any binary files from this storage space. Data boundary fragmentation will be enforced through directory-level access control lists, ensuring each service or CI/CD workflow only has read and write permissions on its exact designated directory. The NFS server configuration also needs to be adjusted to prevent containers running with the highest administrative privileges from modifying the file ownership of other services on the shared partition.
Finally, for the orchestration and monitoring infrastructure, all connections to the Argo Workflows server must be transitioned to the HTTPS encrypted protocol to protect authentication tokens. The orchestration system must be supplemented with restriction rules so that only approved workflow templates are capable of execution. Container groups without the need to communicate with the cluster management system will have their automatic service account token mounting feature disabled. Concurrently, the Grafana monitoring platform will be configured using an infrastructure-as-code approach to lock the editing functionality of default dashboards, ensuring the integrity of observability data under any attack scenario.
3.9. Summary of Issue-Solution Mapping
To support tracking and cross-referencing between weaknesses in section 3.7 and potential solutions in section 3.8, the table below summarizes 1-1 mapping between each issue and corresponding solution. For solutions with multiple sub-actions, the table uses solution family code to maintain consistency in lookup.
Issue ID	Solution ID	Weakness summary
IS-1	SOL-1	Lack of Network Policy and Least Privilege implementation
IS-2
SOL-2.1, SOL-2.2	Health check in challenge deployment
IS-3
SOL-3	Action log depends on client side
IS-4
SOL-4	Expose challenge port directly
IS-5
SOL-5	Challenge pod isolation and privilege shortcomings
IS-6
SOL-6.1, SOL-6.2, SOL-6.3, SOL-6.4	Argo workflow become unresponsive when lacking resources
IS-7
SOL-7	Security configuration vulnerabilities
IS-8
SOL-8	N+1 query problem
IS-9
SOL-9	DI lifetime not suitable
IS-10
SOL-10	Redis KEYS blocking
IS-11	SOL-11	Lack of CSRF protection
IS-12	SOL-12	Polling-based monitoring and code quality
IS-13.1	SOL-13.1	Contest-state and prerequisite logic gaps in challenge file download
IS-13.2	SOL-13.2	Path traversal risk in challenge file download
IS-14	SOL-14	Race condition in challenge lifecycle and submit flow
IS-15	SOL-15	Deployment Listener sequential processing causes backlog
IS-16	SOL-16.1, SOL-16.2, SOL-16.3	UX limitations in Monitoring and Log
IS-17	SOL-17	Dashboard lacks in-depth analysis
IS-18	SOL-18	Lack of Reward Query
IS-19	SOL-19	User and Team management limitations
IS-20	SOL-20	Submission management limitations
IS-21	SOL-21	Lack of Instance History
IS-22	SOL-22	Lack of Audit Log
IS-23	SOL-23	Lack of Action Log for administrators
IS-24	SOL-24	Import/Export not stable
IS-25	SOL-25	Bracket and scoreboard not synchronized
IS-26	SOL-26	Lack of automated CI/CD
IS-27	SOL-27	View/Search Challenges limited
IS-28	SOL-28	Lacking challenge deployment configuration
IS-29	SOL-29	Lack of dynamic challenge support
IS-30	SOL-30	Lack of version history for challenge
IS-31	SOL-31	Lack of safe rollback for challenge
IS-32	SOL-32	Lack of Shared Instance challenge type
IS-33	SOL-33	Dependency on Docker Hub for image registry
Table 11: Issue-Solution Mapping Summary
4. Business Opportunity
4.1. Market demand
The strong development of CTF (Capture The Flag) in the cybersecurity field has created large demand for platforms to organize CTF competitions in a stable, secure and scalable way. CTF has now become an important tool in evaluating, researching and developing cybersecurity personnel at educational institutions. For participants, CTF competitions serve as an excellent foundational step for pursuing a career in cybersecurity and information safety field (According to the CỔNG THÔNG TIN ĐIỆN TỬ HỌC VIỆN ANND4. At FPT University, the annual FPTU SecAthon - large-scale CTF event - is setting increasingly high requirements for technical infrastructure serving competitions. With long competition time, increasing number of teams and contestants, as well as the complexity of challenges, the CTF competition platform needs to be comprehensively upgraded to fully meet the organizers’ requirements on stability, security and high load handling. This urgent demand stems from the reality that the current system still has weaknesses in architecture, security and user experience, which need to be overcome to ensure the competition takes place successfully and professionally.
4.2. Target customers
The target customer group of F-CTF is determined based on the need to organize cybersecurity competitions in the market, including three main groups:
First are educational institutions, especially universities, academies and colleges that have training or orientation in the field of information security and information technology. This group has the need to use the CTF platform to organize academic competitions, technical playgrounds and activities to evaluate student capabilities in the cybersecurity field.
Second are academic clubs and student communities in cybersecurity. This is the group of users that regularly organizes internal CTF competitions on medium and small scales, with high requirements on flexibility, challenge customization capability and reasonable operation costs.
Third are organizations, enterprises and units operating in the cybersecurity field. These units can use F-CTF to organize professional competitions, personnel selection programs or internal capability evaluation activities in the cybersecurity field.
4.3. Competitive value
The core competitive value of F-CTF lies in solving the limitations of current platforms. While systems such as CTFd or GZ::CTF meet basic competition needs, they are often limited in limiting the number of challenge instances that can run simultaneously for each team, or incur quite large copyright costs.
The F-CTF system is built separately, optimized for real competition environments. With advantages such as deep customization settings, allowing organizers to self-decide the number of instances running simultaneously, along with infrastructure design towards zero downtime.
In addition, the interface and functions are customized to ensure organizers can quickly detect and handle incidents during competitions thanks to centralized logging and management. Compared to expensive commercial solutions, F-CTF provides complete control and customization in technology, data and operation processes, ensuring absolute transparency and technological autonomy for the school.
Besides the technical factor, the system also brings competitive value in terms of brand identity when designed according to the distinctive identity of FPT University. This not only enhances user experience but also contributes to building a professional image of the school in the cybersecurity community.
4.4. Expansion potential
F-CTF has high expansion potential thanks to flexible architecture and ability to deploy in many different environments. The system can be applied to many organizations and units that need to organize large-scale cybersecurity competitions and can also aim for cooperation with management agencies or professional associations to expand the organization’s scope. In the enterprise sector, F-CTF can be applied to many large organizations and companies, not only in the technology field but also in industries such as finance, banking or fields with high requirements for system security, serving the organization of internal capability evaluation competitions or professional events. In addition, the system could develop according to the global SaaS service model with multi-language and multi-region support, allowing provision of the CTF organization platform for international customers and expanding operation scope to the global market.
5. Software Product Vision
5.1. Vision 
The product vision is to build a stable, secure and scalable Capture The Flag (CTF) platform, specially designed for organizing the annual FPTU SecAthon competition at FPT University. The system aims to become the most reliable and professional CTF organization platform for this large-scale competition, ensuring a fair, transparent and high-quality competition experience for all participating contestants. The product plays the role of a professional CTF organization tool, where competing teams can compete with high-quality challenges in a safe and stable competitive environment.
5.2. Core values
The core values that FCTF brings are built on the following pillars:
●	Stability and reliability: The system ensures stable operation throughout the competition time, even in competitions lasting many hours or days, with minimized downtime. Multi-layer security mechanisms are deeply integrated into the system architecture to prevent forms of cheating, sabotage attacks or unauthorized exploitation during the competition. Access management, session control and user behavior monitoring are performed tightly to ensure fairness and safety for the entire competition. In addition, the centralized administration interface combined with a comprehensive logging system allows the operation team to monitor system status in real time, quickly detect and handle arising incidents. This contributes to maintaining a professional, stable and reliable competition experience for all participating contestants.
●	Flexible scalability: The system could adapt to different usage scales, allowing each team to deploy multiple challenge instances in parallel without affecting overall performance. For large-scale competitions such as SecAthon, F-CTF has strong scalability to handle a large number of simultaneous access requests, with many challenge instances deployed in parallel in a short time. The system architecture allows flexible resource allocation and recovery, ensuring stable performance even when load increases suddenly.
●	Ease of use and user-friendly: One of the outstanding values of F-CTF is the ability to provide an intuitive and friendly usage experience for all participants. The system interface carries the distinctive identity of FPT University and is optimized for different user groups. For contestants participating in the competition, operations such as accessing challenges, deploying instances and submitting flags are designed simply, clearly and easy to understand. The system aims to minimize technical barriers, allowing contestants to focus on solving challenges instead of encountering difficulties in using the platform. For organizers, administration tools are designed in an intuitive and consistent direction, supporting competition configuration, user management and progress tracking effectively, ensuring the competition proceeds smoothly.
5.3. Target audience
The target audience of F-CTF is determined based on usage roles in the system:
The first group is students and CTF contestants. This is the central user group of the system, including students of any year at university studying subjects related to information security, as well as contestants passionate about the CTF subject nationwide. F-CTF helps provides a platform for participants to practice with real simulated situations, allowing experimentation, making mistakes and learning from the process without worrying about accidentally damaging the real system or violating security regulations, helping participants improve their level and practical capability.
The second group is organizers and technical operation teams. Organizers and technical operation teams are the group responsible for deploying, monitoring and ensuring the system operates stably throughout the contest or teaching activities. For this group, administration tools, real-time system status monitoring and user support are key factors. F-CTF provides the ability to track the status of challenge instances, early detection of performance or security incidents, as well as support for quick handling of arising issues during the competition. A well-designed platform with an operator perspective will contribute to ensuring the continuity, fairness and professionalism of the entire event.
5.4. Product objectives
The main objective of F-CTF is to build a professional, stable and reliable Capture The Flag organization platform for the annual FPTU SecAthon competition. One of the core objectives of F-CTF is to provide contestants with a professional and fair competition environment, allowing teams to solve cybersecurity challenges in many different fields. The system aims to ensure stability, security and high load handling capability throughout the competition time, while providing effective administration tools for organizers to monitor, supervise and handle incidents promptly. Through this, F-CTF contributes to improving the quality of the competition and building the reputation of the SecAthon event in the cybersecurity community.
5.5. Long-term orientation
The long-term orientation of F-CTF focuses on building a sustainable and professional CTF organization platform, playing the role of core infrastructure for the annual SecAthon competition of FPT University. In addition, through organizing the SecAthon competition with increasingly higher quality, F-CTF contributes to the development of the cybersecurity community at FPT University. The competition creates opportunities for outstanding students to demonstrate their skills and knowledge in a real competition environment. Data and achievements from the competition can be used as a basis to identify and select talents for professional competition teams, contributing to enhancing the position of FPT University in the cybersecurity field.
6. Project Scope & Limitations
6.1. In Scope
The F-CTF project focuses on overcoming limitations and weaknesses in the architecture and operation process of the current system, while upgrading core components to improve stability, security, processing performance and user experience. The following main improvements and features are included in the scope to ensure high readiness, good usage experience and practical value:
●	Deploying ChallengeGateway to control challenge access: Building an intermediate gateway acting as the only entry point from the outside to challenge backends, overcoming the problem of directly exposing network ports and preventing unauthorized access between challenges.
●	Improving the Health Check mechanism in challenge deployment: Applying readiness probe to ensure the connection string is only returned when the service is truly ready to serve requests.
●	Enhancing challenge template isolation and security mechanism: Redesigning the challenge deployment template with sandbox runtime, Pod Security Standards, NetworkPolicy and minimum privilege constraints to limit the impact scope of challenges on the system.
●	Enhancing the stability of the challenge deployment process: Improving the mechanism for handling challenge environment initialization requests through control plane isolation, configuring resource and timeout for workflows, and establishing resource priority mechanism to avoid workflow hanging or deadlock.
●	Optimizing system performance and improving source code quality: Refactoring some backend components to eliminate anti-patterns such as N+1 query and incorrect DI lifetime configuration. At the same time standardizing code architecture, applying centralized error handling mechanism and switching from polling model to event-driven monitoring using Kubernetes Informer/Watcher to reduce load on API Server and improve system response capability. Implementing multi-layer path control in the challenge file download function: overcoming the path manipulation vulnerability allowing contestants to arbitrarily access directories in NFS mount.
●	Improving management experience and operation process: Upgrading the administration interface with optimized search, filter and pagination functions for user, team, challenge and submission management modules. Adding operation support tools such as challenge data analysis dashboard, Reward Query module to serve awards and batch data import/export mechanism.
●	Improving system activity monitoring and tracing capability: Upgrading the Monitoring and Log page with filtering functions by team, user, instance status and challenge type, and supporting real-time log updates. In addition, implementing administration modules such as Instance History, Audit Log and Action Log to record activity history and support incident tracing during operation.
●	Implementing multi-layer path control in the challenge file download function: Overcoming the path manipulation vulnerability allowing contestants to arbitrarily access directories in NFS mount by implementing four independent control layers.
●	Building automated CI/CD process for system deployment: Deploying a complete CI/CD pipeline based on GitHub Actions organized into four stages of change detection, parallel build, automatic deployment and result checking, helping to shorten the deployment process from many manual steps down to one git push operation.
6.2. Out of Scope
Due to the specific characteristics of each challenge type, the Dynamic Flag mechanism cannot be applied to the entire system and is outside the general implementation scope of this version.
III. References
¹ Kubernetes Security Checklist. Available at: 
https://kubernetes.io/docs/concepts/security/security-checklist/ [Accessed 22 Jan. 2026]. 
² Pod Security Standards. Available at: 
https://kubernetes.io/docs/concepts/security/pod-security-standards/ [Accessed 22 Jan. 2026]. 
3 Reserve Compute Resources for System Daemons. Available at: 
https://kubernetes.io/docs/tasks/administer-cluster/reserve-compute-resources/ [Accessed 22 Jan. 2026]. 
4 Học viện an ninh nhân dân. Capture the Flag: Cuộc chơi của hacker và các chuyên gia bảo mật Available at: https://antoanthongtin.vn/tin/capture-the-flag-cuoc-choi-cua-hacker-va-cac-chuyen-gia-bao-mat [Accessed 31 Jan. 2026]. 
5 CTF Handbook. Available at: https://ctf101.org/ [Accessed 31 Jan. 2026]. 
6 Port Swigger. Available at: https://portswigger.net/ [Accessed 31 Jan. 2026]. 
Other sources of reference:
Acefortis. https://acefortis.com/what-is-capture-the-flag-ctf/
CyberVista. https://certify.cybervista.net/capture-the-flag-a-gamification-of-cybersecurity-learning/
Whitehat. https://whitehat.vn/threads/toi-moi-choi-ctf-va-ban-cung-the-steganography.17616/


